Truly, one of the greatest films of all time, Blade Runner stamped itself on my consciousness at an early age. I was blown away by the sheer scale of the film, the humanity of it’s characters, the depth at which each one developed, the action, the scenes, everything!!! But behind it all, was Vangelis, the genius. He stoked the fires of intrigue with the first few bars of the films opening sequence. He gave credence to Deckard’s doubt on the rooftops in this very song. But most of all , he helped you Believe. And that’s what a great soundtrack does, it helps you disengage from the real world, and really immerse yourself into the cinematic experience, in a way that no tv-show canned generic muzak ever could. The strings follow the surges of adrenalin, the bass follows your heartbeat, the suspense of a violin string pulling you to the edge of your seat . . . .
Dissection lasted a few weeks and besides the crayfish and frog tricks, Debby also found a dried up earthworm as a bookmark one day. I liked that one. But, we moved on and Debby didn’t find any more objects in her food. I started to feel bad again after reading this.
I am on this panel with Michael Grant, Jon Sciezska, and Daniel Handler.
Yes, HB does act up when you’re around, and after you leave. You and I disagree on how this should be handled, but as his father I decide what’s best for him.
I make mistakes when I'm creating. Time-consuming, frustrating, and occasionally boneheaded mistakes. Sometimes I think that blogs like ours celebrate the finished objects and make the process seem so beautiful and seamless. But it never is. Sweaters get frogged and reknit, sewn seams get ripped back, and even designs are flawed. Trust me.
Come back and let me know..
Ralph Gerhardt, 33, New York, N.Y.
Now, with my Diana, I seem to be having the opposite issue. I am not sure whether anyone has trick to this. I can't really use the viewfinder since it doesn't look through the lens.
Translation & Transportation
It is all make believe, you know?
The children were so amazing in that they just get what the books are about. They don’t miss a thing and they embed a book’s message in their hearts. Kids who read good books are packing a lot of good stuff that will be useful some day. As Newbery winning author Richard Peck says, children should read because the words that build a story become theirs to build their lives.
WHY THREE ACCOUNTS?
Why had Adriana’s dreams started predicting the future?
11 Prayer Of Death Part One
1) Don’t get caught. Never go to their place and lipstick/perfumes/biting/scratching are prohibited.
Based on BBB files, this business has an unsatisfactory record with the Bureau, because there is a pattern of complaints, and the business has not corrected the underlying reason for the complaints...
By rights I ought to be launching into an Oscar style acceptance speech at this point...I would like to take this opportunity to thank...
"'Sup Puddin,
*poor Chanyeol*
Some sensitive topics relating to politics, Thai king and prince, Buddhism. When telling jokes to your girl, make sure the jokes are easy to understand. Otherwise, she maybe misunderstands you. It is advisable not to tell your girl or other people what you like most. If you do so they may have the feeling that they are in duty bound to send what you like to you.
Now this is a terribly complicated technique – one that is only practiced by the the most experienced of the experienced. Please pay close attention:
Sigh… I’ve added him back. It’s just not worth the fight.
I haven't written about daycare too much because every time I start to it makes me want to cry. We started Charlotte in what I thought was a really great daycare (highly rated, clean, nice teachers, etc.). However, it was just not a good fit for her. I'm pretty sure she just cried all day (which makes me sick to my stomach to think about). I think she went to that daycare for a total of 11 days (and not even full days at that). We have since moved her to a really awesome place and her teachers are wonderful! She does not spend all day crying and when we pick her up she is still her happy, smiley self. Still, every day we drop her off I feel like my heart is breaking. Mom guilt takes over and whispers in my ear, "A good mom wouldn't leave her baby at daycare all day. How can you do that to your baby?" It literally kills me. I know she is being well taken care of and her teachers are so good and loving to her, but it's still so hard. I look at other moms as they drop off their kids and I wonder if they experience the same mom guilt as me. Is this normal? Does it get any easier?
N.A. flute
Again different foundations give different effects. The nanoblur is very mattifying so Ive found a glowy type foundation works better on top of it something like revlon photo ready/ clinique dewy smooth that type of thing.
Scandal 2: Pat Harrington and the Sex Dungeon
“What’s he look like – not that I’m concerned about that – but just curious.”
Can’t think of anything else to write, kind of long winded tonight anyway.
After World War II, America became a superpower. Our manufacturing base grew dramatically; the industrialized revolution was so great that the American dollar replaced gold as the reserve currency of other world central banks. There was a U.S. job boom.
*Heat gun
Exploit how vulnerable I am
One April morning, a boat washes ashore carrying a dead man – and a crying baby. Safe from the real world, Tom and Izzy break the rules and follow their hearts.
FHK
The house, where it has not yet been 'restored' was lovely, and very atmospheric but the house is used as a holiday home for up to 12 guest at between £1500 and £3000 a week and it is available for letting 3 weeks out of 4 and has a long list of people waiting to stay but the interior has been modernised too much and has lost the historic feel in many of the rooms which is a shame.
The terms and conditions for the Postdoctoral Fellowship (PDF) are as follows:
soars into a higher song. I wipe
And someplace; Dickie doesn’t know where, but only in his imagination are the graves of two men, Chuck and Doc who may only be remembered by him, nonetheless they form a part of his past and are remembered with compassion and the dignity that escaped them in life.
Ally or not Ally – By Abbas Daiyar
Mom: “No.”
Towards the end of my Junior year of high school my family started going to a new church. We knew the pastor and his family and were very excited to join their church. Right after we started, they had a function for Memorial Day weekend and we decided to go. It was out at the property of a family that went to the church. This family had a large pond in their backyard surrounded by a beach of white sand (sound familiar? If you have been watching my vlogs, it should).
2 tablespoons granulated sugar
like for 87 days now.
3. Cincinnati Bengals
And now, what you've really been waiting for:
There are stories here, of English hosting BBQ’s for a mixed crowd. When the food was served the Foreigners rushed forward and filled their plates, merely for the Bulgarians to look on in bafflement. Only when a good local friend, (used to the ways of the bizarre Brits) got up and served each person a full plate, did everyone eat.
And eventually, the top of the path, car in sight!
Saturday was my annual trip to Philadelphia to see CZW's Cage of Death 11. Since we make a whole day out of it, of course I hit up the local record stores. Since I was short on cash I only ended up going to the Philly Record Exchange, and Repo Records. And here is my buys from this weeked!
Hazel and the Design Team
TIME TO CHANGE THAT!
FACTBOX-Key elements of possible U.S. debt deal: U.S. lawmakers were working furiously on Sunday to hammer out details of a deal to raise the U.S. borrowing limit and put in place a deficit-reduction plan to help avert a potentially catastrophic debt default.
Yea, I can mock myself, Hubby. Beat that. Who has the better sense of humor now?
Paul Martin writes about the insidious effects of shaming, weaving together his personal story of coming to terms with his sexuality and his professional experience as a psychologist.
My friend, my beloved, my well-wisher… my very soul becomes a void.
making pizza. and snowmen. and dinosaurs. and ice cream sundaes.
The 12 raw images I took into ACR and processed them all exactly the same and saved as jpg files. These 12 jpg’s were loaded into StarStax and blended on lighter mode. This was fine, the ISS trail was night and bright but the cloud movement was nasty and not smooth. To get around this I stacked the 12 images again using the “average” method which gave a much more pleasing image with the clouds but a faint ISS trail. I then blended the first image into this on lighten mode and decreased the exposure until only the bright ISS trail and stars remained. The resulting image was flattened and tweaked in photoshop to produce the final image.
Hugs!
The whirling ways of stars that pass -
A whole year ago. A friend of mine told me recently she hasn’t really felt the recession in the U.S. After I gave her a very cold look, I told her she was lucky, ever so lucky. I got lucky to find a job, and even though it may drive me crazy every other day, I am truly lucky to have my job.
I assume the "Yuengling" the new 'dark' beer is on par with is Yuengling Lager; dark mainly by comparison with Coors Light, but still. Love to give this new beer a try, but for now it's only in draft; the brewery hopes to have bottles soon.
Wow, can you believe we are on Sketch 100? What a milestone and I am so thrilled that we are still going strong. Next month is our 2 year sketch challenge anniversary and we have some very special things planned for you. Stay tuned for all those details and be sure to come celebrate with us!! Now on to this weeks sketch!! Please note that I am out of town and this post is being pre-scheduled. If any info is missing, It will be posted asap.
George Zimmerman has FINALLY been arrested and charged with a crime. The prosecutor has charged Mr. Zimmerman with 2nd degree murder. It’s possible that this is an overcharge, because manslaughter would probably be easier to convict, but I have to assume that the prosecutor knows what she is doing. Regardless of the charge; and really, regardless of whether Mr. Zimmerman is ultimately found guilty or not guilty, the important thing is that the facts of the case will be presented in a court of law so that guilt or innocence can be determined based not on one person’s opinion, or the bias of the police, but instead based upon the facts. George Zimmerman needs to answer some questions about what was suspicious about Trayvon Martin. About why he thought Trayvon Martin was on drugs. These are questions that are important, not only in this case, but also on the national conscience about race.
I sometimes wish I was a morning person, up before the lark etcetera. But I'm not. On the other hand, I'm fine with being up all night, and going to sleep way after sunup.
Perhaps this view is faulty and James redeems himself through the resolution that my professor focused on instead. Perhaps James’s portrayal of women is a testament to a woman’s strength in times of deep stress and upset. Perhaps the “portrait” he has painted tells us that Isabel is a strong woman and that her desire to be independent will ultimately get her through the end of an unhappy and seemingly abusive marriage, but that she will do the right thing first by Pansy. Perhaps women are better equipped than men to handle such difficulty when children are in the middle. I’m not sure where I stand, but I know from my feminist perspective, I find it difficult to swallow the fact that of four suitors, Isabel somehow picks the most deadly for her soul.
I bought him a Lantana plant he's been wanting for awhile for our garden. Plus, that weird looking little cactus. It looks like a mini saguaro with about six or eight arms.
The American stout (6% ABV), a beer that has always been part of the launch plans for Turtle Stone, also features Cascade hops, plus the Zythos blended hop. The grain bill includes some oats to give the beer a silky body.
Thirsty recruits his college girlfriend Mary Ann Summers, a huge Ginger Grant fan, to talk Ginger and his father into a secret trip to an exclusive resort. Captained by Skipper Grumby and his first mate Gilligan, of course. But the conspirators’ carefully laid plans go awry when Mrs. Howell gets wind of her husband’s infidelities and joins the voyage… then Hinkley is convinced he’ll finally be able to collect his coveted guano, so he comes along… and Mary Ann doesn’t want to be left out, so she jumps on board as well…
5. Like Chris says, “The sign says school, but my heart says jail.” And they (or we) are looking for any excuse to miss a day of “jail.”
I also planted out some onions (Centurion) and shallots (Pikant). I tend to put them into modules in the cold frame so that they can acquire roots before planting out. I do this partly because I think it will stop the birds pulling them out but also because my mother did it before me!
I love to watch children interact. They are so transparent with their thoughts and feelings. They get in a fight on the playground, express their feelings, and move on. It’s as simple as that. Only later in life do we learn habits and patterns that curtail our self expression. Ever put your hands on the shoulder of a five year old? Most likely they feel relaxed and fluid. Part of that is their age and muscle structure, but most of it is because they allow their emotions to flow through and not build up inside.
5) Back to Englemann when he talks about MASTERY and SPIRAL, he is framing this to a classroom environment. He says the dangers of teachers who don't focus on the students mastering, in part because they don't know their subject themselves (which Liping Ma's book spoke about. Statistics say -and I heard that from a mom not long ago- that in the USA parents are most concern with teachers CARING about students, while in CHINA they are concerned about teachers KNOWING, MASTERING what they teach). In return, from Englemann's paper I read that he criticizes how in our US schools teachers give students tests and when the results are poor they always put the blame on the student (try to test for learning disorders, or claim the students did not learn what was taught), he sharply points to this fact that I find provocative and true, if students 'fail', teachers 'fail'. He talks about how a teacher was presenting a lesson about Sweden and while he states that it would have been easy to teach it to MASTERY, the teacher was just wasting the opportunities of delivering a great lesson by asking these questions:
Some people claim aliens, some people claim lost technology, some people claim it was magic. But in the antediluvian period of the earth, many great things were accomplished by man that we cannot even replicate with our technology today. But in a poem by Lancelot, during that time, he claims it was because we could speak to the two people God walked hand in hand with.
Build your intellect and self worth daily, as winners do, by engaging a mentor or being a mentor, listening to or reading inspiring messages, studying actual patterns of other achievers, and spending time in positive environments.
My name is Gilberto, I’m Gabriella’s best friend and boyfriend. I hope you’ll enjoy our story. Oh yeah, there were some other people involved too. You already met Molly and Juan. Molly is most definitely a character. You can’t help liking her. She gets under your skin, but her personal journey and cards she was dealt in life, make you go soft on her. Juan, he’s another story. We were friends before I met the others. He’s a decent guy. It’s just that, I can’t shake the feeling that he’s interested in Gabriella. While we were stuck on Mona Island, I just feel like something went on that I don’t know about. I hope I’m wrong.
He said he would like to see his department playing a leading role in organising big events such as the upcoming soccer World Cup.
Unfortunately, here and there I still get some seizures and over the years the medications have changed. The types of seizures have also changed with age and amazingly I was able to still have a baby! She is my miracle baby! She is completely healthy thank Gd!
Anyway, I steamed it, kind of, in aluminum foil. Easy recipe!
I come back.
Shadow of Afghanistan is a passionate work of great courage by two filmmakers who, despite murder of their two friends on this documentary mission, risk their lives on frontlines with Afghan fighters and go to refugee camps on Afghanistan-Pakistan border and follow events in the country throughout decades of chaos that witness from withdrawal of Soviet troops and factional civil war among Mujahideen to rise of Taliban and their alliance with Al-Qaeda, the bloodthirsty group of Arab terrorists who make Afghanistan their launching pad for 9/11 attacks, when the US finally wakes up to the blunder of its own—abandoning and ignoring Afghanistan after Soviet withdrawal.
Not like I was when I was four walking the beaches of
Archmage, Level 4 (Metal), Talisman of Preservation, The Amulet of Light, Silver Wand
So … long before I ever took my first breath or was even a glimmer in my parents eyes, God had already written all the days that He ordained for me in His book. God is not surprised by my cancer. God will not be surprised by my death. And what I absolutely must not lose sight of is that my Creator God has given me life … abundant life … on this earth with my wife, family, friends, church and Jesus until those ordained days have run their course.
I hate them and just wish they would just frack off!!!!
Genre: YA Fantasy/Romance
*The definition of “fanatic” at Dictionary.com is “a person with an extreme and uncritical enthusiasm or zeal.”
The huge variety of vibrant shops certainly cater for the tastes of young and old, encompassing the imaginative with the practical. In fact, there’s certainly “something for everyone.” The “lanes” now happily brim with local residents and visitors who are able to enjoy refreshment too – either in a cosy café atmosphere or with the airy freedom of a continental-style outdoor setting. They may possibly be unaware of Enfield’s rich history that shows Henry VIII; Queen Elizabeth the First and her Courtiers also once walked this very ground. Something well worth researching at our local Library – which could also add to a pleasant visit to our Palace Exchange.
So you wanna have fun guys.....then do join into the fun over here at the Fairy Fun Fridays Challenge Blog and even make a chance on winning some fabulous digistamps from our Queenie Roberta......
I adored this book - absolutely adored it. Politi captures the atmosphere of Olvera Street, the historic Latino community in downtown Los Angeles, in a way that both celebrates Juanita's innocence and childhood joy, and honors this Mexican American community. Juanita's parents own a small shop, or puesto, on Olvera Street. It is Juanita's fourth birthday, and her parents give her a small white dove (symbolic? yes, I do think so). On the day before Easter, Juanita takes her dove to the Old Mission Church for the annual Blessing of the Animals.
SO if you don't hear from me, I an off line maybe without a computer!!
· online state and national vaccine newsletters
31. Then on December 27, 2011, SM revealed the 2nd member of EXO, which is Luhan.
* How long did it take you from initial inspiration to finally achieving the publication deal?
Really the pencil makes a great little stamper for kids, because it keeps them (for the most part) from getting ink all over their fingers. With stamps their little hands are so close to the ink that really, a complete mess on their hands is almost inevitable.
16. Caffeine causes your body to be less metabolically efficient. Less oxygen gets to the cells, therefore less waste is removed from the cells, increasing your risk of every type of cancer.
Along with the win, Chelsea is firmed at 6th on the table, whereas QPR is degraded to the relegation top, just with the goal difference.
Two in three jobs created, or 79,800 went to foreigners in 2011, according to preliminary estimates from the Manpower Ministry, a sign of Singapore’s continued heavy dependence on foreign workers.
28. “Coming Down” by Dum Dum Girls
EVS with licence for mobile phone handsets.
hardships in their homeland, to carve out a new life in America. The
In June, 2010, the Nevada Museum of Art‘s feature exhibition was the art of South American artist Fernando Botero. Botero is a contemporary artist. Although he no longer resides in the country of his birth, his art deals almost exclusively with themes that resonate with Colombia. He studied abroad and was heavily influenced by a number of the great masters whose work he often emulated. To the observer, themes of disaster, terror, inequality, corruption and oppression seem apparent, although he denies that the purpose of his work political activism. This was a fun exhibit to show to children who were fascinated with his exaggerated style that borders on Rococo. Botero was a friend of Colombian author Gabriel Garcia Marquez (100 Years of Solitude) and their works are most reflective of one another’s.
Among the Hezbollah killers released is Samir Kuntar, who is returning to a hero's welcome in Lebanon,organized by Hezbollah and the Siniora government. He is seen as a heroic figure by both Hezbollah,most of the Lebanese and by the Palestinians, and it is revealing to look at why Kuntar was in an Israeli prison serving two life terms after being convicted in an Israeli court.
“Idiot!!! Something bit me!!! Look!!!”
Another thrifty find the other day was this cute shirt from Goodwill for $5! Sorry for the horrible picture, but you get the idea! And I have owned those jeans now for over 9 years. And I still love them! They have gotten mileage.
Costumes: (6/10) – The wardrobe is… fine, and I do like the practical efforts that went into the inmates’ scars and Maggie Grace’s ‘impromptu manly makeover’, as I call it. Still, as you can expect, this is also pretty basic. Once again, it also feels like Lockout borrowed a few of its costume designs from video games, since they probably didn’t have money to hire high-end visual designers. So, to save cash, they just slightly modified designs from other sci-fi stories. There’s some spacesuits towards the end that were obviously ‘borrowed’ from the Halo universe, and it feels like Snow’s combat suit for exploring the prison is a lighter and more realistically proportioned version of the same outfit worn by the COG soldiers in the Gears of War games. It might be a giant coincidence, but I get the distinct impression that Luc Besson was on his Xbox 360 when he was dreaming up this movie…
I learned one more thing in history class: America has historically supported the most unjust policies against its minorities – practices that were even protected by the law – only to look back later and ask: ’what were we thinking?’ Slavery, Jim Crow, the internment of the Japanese during World War II – each was widely accepted by American society, each was defended by the Supreme Court. But as time passed and America changed, both people and courts looked back and asked ’What were we thinking?’ Nelson Mandela was considered a terrorist by the South African government, and given a life sentence. But time passed, the world changed, they realized how oppressive their policies were, that it was not he who was the terrorist, and they released him from prison. He even became president. So, everything is subjective - even this whole business of “terrorism” and who is a “terrorist.” It all depends on the time and place and who the superpower happens to be at the moment.
Or did you finally get away?
Perry's Ballad
Once this enormous prize has been given away we will start doing challenges of our own. These challenges will be held fortnightly to allow you enough time to create your masterpieces and enter the challenges.There will be sketch challenges, colour challenges, inspiration images and much much more.
After several cups of tea and lots of praise for such yummy tea, my wife came home. I made her wait in the living room to watch the little princess bring me a cup of tea, because it was, “just the cutest thing!”
5.) NO PART of the Bible mentions homosexuality AS WE KNOW IT TODAY!
How much? The new legislation states that by 2016 the UK will have to collect 45 tonnes of e-waste for every 100 tonnes of e-goods put on sale three years previously. By 2019 this must rise to a rate of 65%; in other words, a figure comparable to 85% of e-waste generated.
it's not the path to freedom
I had a small amount of wool left so I made a cardigan to match that would fit a doll or teddy...
2-What is your best and worst run/race experience?
One thing I didn't mention in the previous posts was how these services were paid for. I believe the Early Intervention program receives county, state and federal funds. I'm not completely sure, but there is no cost to use their services. The private speech and OT are billed to our private health insurance through my husband's employer. (We exhausted that coverage a couple months ago.) Then, whatever isn't covered is paid by Medicaid. Goldie qualifies for this because she has a diagnosis of Down syndrome.
I have kindof a semi-green thumb, kindof brownish- green. But this year I was determined to change all of that. Thanks to Pinterest I had gardening ideas/tips coming out my ears, I have a "board" dedicated to it called "Garden Awesomeness". So back in December I got seeds and planted them in little bio-degradable cups. I watered them, tucked them in at night when it got cold, fed them plant food. These little seedlings got more love than my kids do on some days (kidding, kidding.... well kindof!) Come march we prepped the ground with all kinds of mulch/compost. I dug holes and put in some drainage pipes scattered thru-out the garden. The thinking here was that it will water the roots deeper, encouraging them to grow. So far it seems to be working. I found the idea here. Of course I water up top too.
The other thing I enjoy, is how comfortable Bernard seems to be in describing everyday things like the red herrings that the English eat, or how archers are fairly limited to England because of the time and training it takes to master the bow. How things like cannons are starting to roll out here but aren't at their peak yet.
Listen to this incredible clip of Eliot reading part one of his own poem, from the Poetry Archive, here:
I used to use it as kind of an insult to say that Chevelle are a more pop Tool and a less weird Deftones, because ostensibly sanding the edges off of two of the more unique hard rock bands on mainstream radio in the last 15 years should be a bad thing, right? But the fact is, Chevelle really have gradually staked out a territory that is uniquely theirs, and the short, hooky songs they make really are more my speed than those of their most obvious influences.
JSB—Some county engineers or whatever laid it out without knowing what they were doing.
I got a $1,000! Apparently, one of my scholarships had not reimbursed all my money. I am usually on top of this, but I did not know this scholarship was worth an extra grand! This means I am not so worried about spending money on our vacation next week, since I have extra money on the budget.
I love the original "Keep Calm and Carry On" and all the variations people come up with. Here's my contribution to the Keep Calm line.
Even hardened security men were stunned by the bloody scene and stood around silently. “The quiet is uncanny”, said one.
Booktalk: A young boy joins a new hockey team…
Anywho..
In 2007, Ben and Emily Huh started Cheezburger, one of the largest online humor publishers in the world where millions of people come every month to get their 5-minutes of happiness. Cheezburger counts a passionate fan base of 25 million people who upload more than 500,000 pictures and videos as well as view 500 million pages and 110 million videos each month.
While Swann presents the dragons living in the greater Cleveland area as lacking in human virtue, his hero, reporter Kline Maxwell realizes this is because dragons are not human. In a world turned upside down by the realizations that we are not alone in the universe, and that magic does exist, part of Maxwell’s journey is coming to the realization that his world is upside down, Cleveland will never be the same, and judging non-human entities by human standards is not right. To Maxwell’s credit, the long overdue realization is taken in stride.
just to give back & show our appreciation....
fifteenth century Florence, Italy. When she is asked by one of her rich and regular customers to pose as Flora in Sandro Botticelli's painting called 'La Primavera' Luciana obliges. But after she is dismissed abruptly and without payment she is irate. When she finds a cartone, a smaller unfinished version of the painting, stashed away in the room she takes it as her due payment.
But not all power plant workers have a formal classroom education beyond high school, and many companies can’t even afford to pay for classes at community college prices. The widespread availability of industrial online training, however, makes learning about instrumentation and control systems convenient for anyone with access to a computer. This accessibility for instrumentation training allows your entire team to rehearse protocol so equipment and processes are handled with the utmost safety on a daily basis.
Anyone for coffee? Usually did the trick… Was this yours? No it’s hers.. I thought she wanted chocolate.. no that was me!…. And that’s it you’ve got half a dozen talking already. Another trick was to start telling crap jokes to the front passengers. Now in my experience, the loonies sit at the back and usually sort themselves out, but by telling crap jokes to the suits in the front eventually would lead to someone from the back coming forward to see what was going on.. and so it went on.
I went on a walk with my friend G this afternoon. We didn’t venture far, but we covered new ground. Or at least, new ground for me. Somehow, I’ve managed to live here for more than a year and remain totally oblivious of this patch of heaven located just a few minutes from my flat – a car-free, quiet shortcut which takes you through tall corridors of trees and over fresh, beautiful soil and grass. The air was pregnant with the scent of autumn. We saw a laughing lady playing Fetch with her dog and a frisbee.
The 23 organisations, which also include Mencap, the RNIB and Leonard Cheshire, want MPs to back an amendment to the Legal Aid and Sentencing Bill - put forward by Lib Dem Tom Brake – reversing the decision when the proposed legislation is debated. The disability rights groups say the changes mean up to 80,000 disabled people will no longer be able to get access to publicly funded legal advice to help them challenge benefit decisions.
At the elder law firm of Dutton & Casey, P.C., we understand that just as your family circumstances evolve over time, so do your elder law needs. To meet these needs, our firm has added another important component in our efforts to holistically service the comprehensive needs of our clients and their families. Life Care Planning is a new way to respond to the challenges that develop as you go through the later stages of your life, such as long-term illness or disability. A Life Care Plan spells out how our elder law attorneys and elder care professionals will work together with you to establish quality care, help with decisions regarding long term care needs, and find sources to finance quality long term care. Our Care Advocate can also work with family caregivers to provide them with assistance to make the difficult decisions they may often be making alone or without any support. To contact our office regarding your situation, please call (312)899-0950 or to read more about our services, check out our website at www.duttonelderlaw.com.
This intersection has always been problematic. Jeepneys stop on all four sides — before and after the intersection, both northwards and southwards — as they wait to fill their cabin with passengers. But lately it has gotten worse.
I awoke on Saturday and remembered that Token had invited me to go to a Halloween house party. I needed a costume. I ended up going as a cop.
other people.
Benefactor then pays off the bills apparently because he doesn't want his wife to find out, and crazy makes a few veiled remarks regarding that at the meeting.
In the event that you feel like you'd like to be educated on the types of gadgets that make me excited about life, you are welcome to read on. Just know that cooking tools provide convenience, not ability. Got it? It's like suzy, I never made pasta before I had her, but that doesn't mean I couldn't make pasta by hand before, and that it wouldn't taste any different.
I want to thank all of you again for following me along on this journey and for continuing to follow me. Never judging, always supporting and forever encouraging. Please know this is not goodbye, just a see you later.
Why did I stay silent until now?
What’s the process when new licensors approach you with their catalogs?
(argh! this is why I shouldn't post late at night...I get goofy)
I’m finding giving up drinking crazily difficult. Inexplicably so.
Here is a quote from Damon Lindelof back in January 2007-
With a sweet kernel; to set budding more,
I have a neighbor who insists on working on the Sabbath. Exodus 35:2 clearly states he should be put to death. Am I morally obligated to kill him myself?
Mr Whitby had been at the hearing in Birkenhead of a Wirral man who refused to pay his council tax, when a group of far-right activists attempted to “arrest” the judge for “treason”.
What are GQ’s primary social media outlets?
This is a tough one. I can't speak for other agents but I know personally that this is a hard question to answer honestly. Put it this way: intellectually speaking, do I ever regret passing on a book? No. I do not. Rationally, I know that if I didn't see the book's potential then I wouldn't have been a good advocate for it. Or if it wasn't a good fit for my list then I wouldn't have known how to sell it--what the competition was or which editors to send it to.
Me: Yessir. You know that white thick stuff that you would put into the frames around the windows and doors to seal them in. It's used to stop air from going through the cracks.
I have now repriced my stories on length as Dean suggested, and at the start of April, I will change the prices in Smashwords, then wait until they are rolled out to all sites, before adjusting the prices on Amazon.
The most incredible thing is that both birth and resurrection are free gifts; one given us to us by our mortal mothers and one given to us by Jesus Christ. They are gifts that no matter how hard we try we will never be able to repay.
layouts and projects that feature anything and
Anaru makes a small cry to assume he’s looking at her in a such way.
It was the main thoroughfare from the older settled portion of the state into South Georgia and Florida; and practically all traffic from and into Florida west of the Okefenokee Swamp, was over that road. It led from Jacksonville on the Ogeechee River in Telfair County, southwesterly through the then county of Irwin (but now Coffee, Irwin, Berrien) through the then county of Lowndes (but now Berrien, Cook and Brooks) into Thomas County and via Thomasville southwardly to the Florida line.
Then I washed my foot until it bled. Not literally, because that would be a terrible mess to clean, but the message remains the same.
love encourages
They were cute. Really cute. Rayanne and I started small talking with them. We let them know right away that we had two comedy sets in about an hour around the corner. The guys were up for it, which was cool. Naturally, Rayanne gravitated towards the blonde and me towards the dark haired one. It’s funny attraction, isn’t it? I’ve always been attracted to dark haired people. Theoretically, I know that Charlize Theron and Jude Law are hot, but they never do it for me like Penelope Cruz and Javier Bardem. The even stranger part – the guys had also decided that one of them would talk on the phone and the other on the computer. Carlos, the dark haired one and quickly becoming MY date was the computer part of his pair and Miguel – Rayanne’s date – was the phone talker. We had a bunch of wine and chit chatted, just the four of us. It was fun. The best part was that it had NONE of the awkwardness that a first date can sometimes have. Mainly because myself and Rayanne, we didn’t give much of a sh*t. Alone we might have been shyer, but together – a force of nature would’ve been the best definition. The guys were the same way. They had an easy way between them and it indicated they had been friends for a long time.
About one third of the Earth is covered in sun-rich deserts creating a potential vast amount of energy resource. If 4 percent of those sun-rich deserts are harnessed the current world’s energy needs would be met.
Scrolling through reader, I came across a post from La Dolce Vita. Noticed something a little familiar about the fashion choice of the Olsen on the right...
*Oatmeal protein bars for snack (See recipe below)
Sean Connery is perfectly cast as Henry Jones, Sr. The abandance of former James Bond players in featured roles is also a nice touch, as I the subtle joke that Indiana is the son of James Bond.
pepper
Savannah Thomas, my first wife (now my ex-wife, still love her though) greeted me by taking a bite out of a candy bracelet I was wearing on my wrist.
Remade a few years later, with sound, as Kongo, it's hard not to draw comparisons between Tod Browning's version and the later film, so closely do they hew to the same template. There are a few substantial differences -- the remake cuts out the extended stage-magic prologue that no doubt fascinated Browning, always a fan of unusual theatre folk, and also adds in a significant character -- but for the most part the narrative is almost jarringly similar, entire scenes playing out with near-identical results. The sound version is, if anything, rather more thoroughgoing in its seediness, layering further outrages on the manifold moral excesses already onscreen in 1928.
And so today, you will hear words that sound like Spanish, flirting with the dialect and tone of French. What you are hearing is living proof of a revolution, born decades ago and still flickering today. Often you will see two La Vanguardia papers – or Catalonia’s largest newspaper and a major newspaper in Barcelona – side by side and you’ll note a difference. One version printed in Catalan, the other in Castilian. La Vanguardia, does a fair job at staying objective; because taking on two different languages can mean taking on different views.
Everybody else
1 lb. box powdered sugar
I was not only lucky enough to purchase a recent work, because her art sells so quickly, but Toni also gifted me an incredible! painting of a Blue Jay, one of most favorite birds. Once framed, this beautiful Jay will have a permanent home on my bedside table.
overall i am happy i picked this palette up. i love the color range since you get neutrals as well as an array of beautiful colors to play with. the texture (extremely smooth and buttery) of the great performing shades is the best i have ever come across, they beat mac and urban decay by a mile. i am especially happy that most of the colors aren't dupeable within my collection.
My writing style tends toward the didactic. My first thoughts about how to compose a post about love for this blog carnival were in the vein of opening with a dictionary definition, followed by some Greek literary allusion(s) and definitions of the four types of love (agape, eros, philia, and storge) as delineated by our soi-disant philosophical ancestors, the Classical Greeks, then on to some more erudite, pontifical, literary excursions into an intellectually superficial explication of the abstract meaning of “love.”
Lois Yingling had heard about the trip all of her life, the time her father, Arthur Miller, and a friend, Earl Hagerman, lit out for the territories, riding their bicycles across the country. It was family lore, a legend passed down by the generations.
They were real strongholds we erected. They separated us from one another, from God, and from God’s kingdom. But because he died, because he did something, the way was opened up, hostility was destroyed, peace has been made, and one new people have been created. This is the action of God. Peterson rightly notes, “When we are pulled into the action, it is God who pulls us in. We acquire our identity not by what we do but by what is done to us” (Practice Resurrection, 117). This destroying, ripping, and opening is God’s action, not ours. We just get to be a part of it and enjoy it. Still, we do play a part in their perpetuation even if the action rests solely in God’s hands.
In a lunar eclipse, the Earth, Sun and Moon are almost exactly in line and the Moon is on the opposite side of the Earth from the Sun. The Moon is full but moves partly into the shadow of the Earth and dims dramatically with the shadowed portion of the lunar surface lit by sunlight that passes through the Earth’s atmosphere. Stronger atmospheric scattering of blue light means that the light that reaches the lunar surface has a reddish hue, so observers on Earth will see a Moon that has a darkened southern tip, with hints of colour that depend on terrestrial conditions.
“Hey friends, after months of waiting I can now proudly tell you that I am the newest member to the Tiffany and Co. family,” she wrote on Facebook. “This is a very exciting time for me now and I want to express my gratitude and appreciation for each and everyone of you for your continuing support. I will be posting more on my blog. Thanks everyone!!”
I interrupt this regularly scheduled Weigh In Wednesday for PICTURES!!! Pictures of what?? THE KITCHEN!! I know, it's taken forever but I've got them & there's a lot of them. They were taken with my iPhone & the lighting isn't the best.
Last night I stuck by my guns and decided NOT to meet my friends at our regular Mexican food restaurant, Mama Don'tEatUs, as Kyle affectionately calls it. But I had to meet them there later to head over to the Brad Paisley concert. So I waited an hour past when they were going and then met up with them. Unfortunately they were still finishing up and even offered me some food and hey, by the way, don't you want a drink? Um, not today but thanks! I did it - I sat there and drank a water and didn't even attempt to reach toward that basket of chips. I was so proud of myself. Then I went to the concert and while everyone else drank, I happily sipped on my $4 bottled water. I was really craving something salty, so I had my friends look out for pickles for me, but they weren't selling them. And I survived.
That a time could ever be,
Arch starts putting stuff away in the bathroom, and finds a buttload of drug paraphenalia in his medicine cabinet. As Nikki discovers more kinky gear, Arch pulls the doorknob off of his bedroom door, effectively trapping himself in the room. Oh, and Kit and Rob find a painting in their room has eyes that move. They remove the picture from the wall, and discover a cat-clock underneath, which explains the moving eyes. Rob puts the painting in the hall, and swiftly closes the door. In Nan's room, she hears a baby crying. It turns out to be a tape recorder playing the sound, but she looks pretty upset. Muffy is briefly seen downstairs, turning out lights and getting ready for bed.
Dieter Rams
And then there was Dave. I was standing watching some of the matches before mine and the guy standing next to me asked if I had a kid wrestling today. I told him no - I was wrestling. He was wonderfully supportive and we started chatting. It turns out that his two teenage daughters wrestle so he was there to support them and coach them. During the course of the conversation he asked if I had anyone in my corner....
That brings us to the other piece of the puzzle... her level of motivation. Olivia has to have the desire to walk. And we don't know if she wants to. I told the doctors that I sometimes think that Olivia doesn't see a need to walk since she is able to get around in her wheelchair and by crawling. Walking is almost impossible with her legs bent, and the work it takes to step in knee immobilizers and AFOs just isn't worth the trouble in her mind. Of course I have no way of knowing if that is what's she thinking... Maybe it's just a momma's wishful thinking that her girl desperately wants to walk...
17.) Boy Name
If you have taken a look at the things I always keep on hand, you might notice that I do not have many (or any) "snacky" foods on it. This is simply because I don't buy them. That is not to say that I never eat them, (if Steve buys some of these types of things, I might be tempted) but I would rather spend my money on better quality products. So, what do my children eat between meals? Here's a slightly comprehensive list.
Chicago Grey
The purpose of socialist production will be simply and solely to satisfy human needs. Production solely for use will replace production for the market with a view to profit, in line with the social basis that the means for producing wealth will belong to and be under the democratic control of the entire community. The production and distribution of sufficient wealth to meet the needs of the socialist community as individuals and as a community will be an administrative and organisational problem. It will of course be no small problem but the tools for solving it have already been created by capitalism.
On the corner of two streets in the center of the village, the Carrer Muralla and the Carrer de Llagestera, you will come along a house whose walls are decorated with a variety of sculptures, as above picture shows.
I had coffee today with one of my former students. I say former, she said ongoing… whatever.
Who could resist a challenge with a theme like that? Color Me Creative is running a challenge (#3 7)until March 2nd - all you have to do is use your copics, promarkers, pencils or other alcohol markers. If you need a laugh while checking out some cool cards, head over and join the fun. You might need your sunglasses!
“My litte Georgian village makes the news…..just not for the right reasons”.
YEASTED CHOCOLATE BROWNIES (EGGLESS)
Xuxa
Her cute family is dairy free, and they drink it daily. If this is the case for you, for sure go follow her instructions (here), for a little bit different version.
Gardenias has a sampling of my stories in it, but I chose each story on purpose for this collection. Do men have the same tender hearts as women do? Yes, I think so. Especially men from my generation.
Then we have wild cards like cold fusion, for which, on the other hand, great skepticism is in order, I believe, though some of those in the know aren't so skeptical. (Rossi, the promoter, apparently has a Ph.D. from a diploma mill.) If that were to work out in a big way, it could be goodbye for Saudi Arabia and much of the Middle east, though doubtless on a longer time frame than the next five years.
B. Jesus told them that they were go make other disciples.
Happy Monday Everyone!! I hope you all had a great weekend. Mine was nice. We celebrated a bunch of birthdays in my family, so I ate a bunch of birthday cake (which is my weakness!!)
Another factor was that over 20 years the average investor had returns of 3.83% while the index did 9.14%.
Hilbre Island is a sandstone outcrop off the coast of West Wirral with plenty to offer anyone up for a blustery hike across the sands. It's part of the Dee Estuary Site of Special Scientific Interest (migrating birds and rare flowers like Rock Sea Lavender) - so special that entry would probably be severely restricted if it could be policed!
Andrew Mitchell, Secretary of State for International Development, said: “CAFOD is working to improve water access, sanitation and hygiene for some of the world’s most vulnerable and neglected people, including those affected by war, climate change and disease. It is potentially life saving work, tackling cholera, helping girls attend school rather than having to fetch water and ensuring that children know about hygiene and waterborne diseases.
I always find it interesting reading how bloggers get started so how better then to start myself! I am going to be blogging about the ins and outs of my weird life and massive shopping habits. My girlfriends always seem to think that I know a fair bit about make up and skin care – so I may base most of it on my recommendations and recent purchases.
Fingerprints of the Gods: A Quest For the Beginning and the End by Graham Hancock hits the £1 shelf in my shop.
“Oh my God, that was fucking incredible!”
It’s a leader’s duty, no matter at what level within the organization to safeguard and work towards the fulfillment of these responsibilities on an ongoing basis.
I've nothing left to eat!
Gypsy - Miller
One thing that jumped out to me while watching Saw VI was how good Tobin Bell is. The dialogue isn't great but it's fine. It become blatantly obvious how silly the dialogue can be when it's in the hands of less skilled actors but Bell makes it work. In VI you see his character as a man coming to terms with cancer and those scenes are down right impressive from his end.
Over the last 25 years or so, I've spent some time feeling sad that my father often found it easier to spend time with my stepmother's family than with ours. I've spent some time feeling that she didn't treat him very well. During my "Tuesdays with Dad," I saw a new side of her - of them. I watched her nurture and care for him, and I saw them sweetly tell one another, "I love you," and their faces showed they really meant it. I let go of my resentment. And I spent enough time with him that in the end I felt no urgency to tell one more story or say "I love you" one more time. Equally important, I'd heard him say those words to me often enough that I believed it, I knew it.
OMG, when they wanted to put the shoes on! "Do they...look like they're your...size?" "Shut up." "Are you..." "Getting the urge to French Siegfried myself into oblivion?"
Lower her on my dick
Working the brown and black was challenging, but I think I succeeded. The leopard skirt has never been worn to work before (a little too bootylicious), but is calmed down by the long boyfriend cardigan and the white shirt. I hate white shirts...loathe them...but realize that once in a while, they are very functional and nice. Kept the tights plain brown and added the Fluevog gladiators to echo the belt "fencing", then instead of a load of jewelry, did the big floppy bow at the neckline (it's a belt from a skirt).
Eternal life is letting God's spirit inhabit me in such a way that my neighborhood is powerfully affected because I live there. As my friend Graham would say, "No one is safe from a blessing." :)
When it came down to it, Sprint’s plan of 1500 minutes and unlimited data and text was the most affordable. Plus, they offered a $125 credit PER LINE to port a number over to a Sprint smartphone. Verizon was about $30/month more expensive. AT&T was only slightly more expensive than Sprint per month, but their plan only includes 2 GB of data. I know that’s a lot, but I also don’t want to worry about overages when I’m stuck at an airport for 6 hours and decide to stream a movie.
Maybe stay away from pizza right before bed? ;)
The crimson red face of his fuming mother came to haunt him. She had turned all shades of red as she screamed and lamented endlessly about the apple of her, her beautiful prized daughter had turned into a rotten apple by mixing with some low-grade scum of the society. She remembered the face of her sister as she explained that they were her friends and part of the group, which performed at social jigs and parties.
So from a government minister, a front-page sex scandal and claims of a honey trap set by "spooks" determined to crush enemies of the president!
Author: Mary Ellis
madhyam-adhikari and the
That’s it. That’s all that is on the statement.
They proclaimed themselves as guides for our learning experiences. My conversations spent with them would hallmark the beginning of a long and lasting relationship with individuals who live in their neighborhood. The content of their conversations, I would later learn, were uniformly filled with intellectual and emotional values that are often times repeated by any such guide as they.
Needless to say, the game went downhill from there. Like the little warrior I am, I played on with my tumor and shrugged off the pain like a pro. Today lefty is singing a different story.. Some bruised knuckles, a broken blood vessel and a couple embarrassments later, I can know impart these words of advice, keep your eyes on the ball and your knuckles off it.
Now in her early thirties, Ros is newly married and a successful academic. She still has the same cheeky sparkle in her eyes that she did when she was little.
For the second year in a row, Simon Says Stamp and Show & The Simon Says Stamp Challenge teams are joining forces to bring you a SUPER blog hop and treasure hunt to celebrate STAMPtember!
characteristic of little children. They were written and used by a Waldorf Kindergarten teacher, and are simply such wonderful little books. If you haven't yet, they are most certainly worth a read. I have yet to hear of any child who doesn't just Love these whimsical stories of fairies and gnomes, water and wind spirits and a wide range of animals found on farmer Johns land.
Back at the wedding ceremony & reception, we felt a little silly because we had already announced the night before at Garba that we were just friends. So, we just played it cool. However, I could tell some of the other guests at the reception were onto us. I didn't know how respond due to the newness of it all.
The Red Sox won the opener on April 20, 1912, 7-6 in 11 innings over the New York Highlanders (who would soon change their name to the Yankees). Boston went on to win the ‘12 World Series and three more in that decade, but then embarked on an 86-year title drought in which the ballpark became the franchise’s biggest star.
(3) While the duty to deliberate does not impose the obligation to decide right, it does imply a necessity which cannot be disregarded, namely, that of having something to support its decision. A decision with absolutely nothing to support it is a nullity, a place when directly attached.
The five men shot Friday morning in a majority-black Tulsa neighborhood were all walking within a three-mile span. A gunman riding in a white pickup truck stopped to ask each victim for directions and then opened fire.
I just had a follow-up visit with my regular doctor as I write this and I have just a little more bad news to add to all I've written. I was told by the doctor who discharged me yesterday that there was a good chance I'd be on coumadin therapy for only 3 months meaning I'd miss very little of this year's riding season. To my disappointment today my doctor said no; that when he's treating for PE, (clots in the lung) coumadin therapy must be for 12 months, no less.
From a collective in Garden Grove (Orange County in SoCal):
Last night he said to me:
Gotta admit that even though I do consider myself an up 'n front Velvets fan I rarely play their legit albums anymore, or even a lot of their bootlegs for that matter. This is mainly because I don't want to become overly familiar with 'em even afte a good 30+ years of knowing these platters by heart, and besides the call hasn't been overcoming me as much as it did when I was a mere 18 and for some strange reason rock 'n' roll seemed to have a deeper, more invigorating meaning in my life than it even does now. When I do spin theVU it's (once again) the early stuff...or shall I say the real early surviving and downright experimental entries from their ESP "Noise" track of pure undistilled beauty or the CHELSEA GIRLS soundtrack where shards of neo-Asian tuning are performed to Ondine's maddening monologue. And not-so-surprisingly this particular platter, the first disque in the '95 Velvet Underground box set which gets way too much play as of late which isn't at all that strange. But as far as the early-EARLY Velvets go, these embryonic versions of the big hits of '66 affect me as much if not more than the original takes, showing a Angus Maclise-less act as they probably sounded back when they were still the Falling Spikes and Electrah Lobel was doing the guitar parts that Sterling Morrison would eventually make his mark with. Sparse, driving and downright intense, these acoustic demos only go to prove that Lou Reed and company didn't need electricity to make highly-charged sounds though when they did it sure helped!
Anyway, unpacking done, we got to the business of furnishing, decorating and adjusting it to our needs. What we left for last, like any sane persons, were putting up pictures. While this may seem reasonable enough, and living without pictures for three months not a big deal, believe me, it was. Because the previous occupant had drilled holes in every. single. freaking. wall. Which were not painted over – he only used a greyish kind of substance to cover them, that only made them more visible. And while this was not such a big problem for most walls, which hold 2 to 3 holes arranged symetrically, one of our living room walls has a grand total of 9 holes. Splattered across it in no recognizable pattern (except maybe of a Leviathan). They look as if a blind man had been drilling for fun. In the dark. (Which is probably rather close to the truth – remember, the man had no lights).
- Lots of Love, Melanie
I posted the full episode of the u.s. challenge, back in 2007, but it was hosted then by google video, and that code no longer works. Thanks KT in Australia for letting me know. This one's direct from Top Gear's own website, using the embed code they supply. Fingers crossed..... Publish...
2.) Circular texts
WHY? ? ?
*and to all of you interested in sponsorship-- i'm getting to you, i promise!
That I get very very twitchy if I don't have one about my person !
I think that everyone, no matter who you are and what you do, wants to have their work appreciated and they don't want others to make them feel that what they are paid for their time and talent isn't worth it. I think my time and talent is worth what little I ask for it. Remember that when you see hand crafted items, time, talent and effort was put into each project. Think about how much time it would take you to do something like that if you were to personally make it, think of professional crafting as some one's career and think about how truly little, the time making it is actually charged for.
all these liberations.
Regionalism seems like it should be common sense. What happens in one part of the region has a real and measurable impact on the rest of the region. Especially in our region – which is so interconnected that in some places you literally cross a street to move from one jurisdiction to the next – it seems incredibly short-sighted to be so insular as to only focus on one’s own jurisdiction.
The turnout came up to about 260! The performances by the two dancers, Jerome and Jeremy Goh got the people clapping. Emceeing the night was a tough job, and I worked up a lingering sorethroat from my recent bout of illness.
The paragon of the cold tsundere love interest. He’s a genius at everything from academics to tennis to cooking. He doesn’t get close to people, so he’s hard to figure out. Naoki has a lot of pride and is confident in his abilities, but when it comes to love he barely lets on that he cares. In favor of romatic gestures, Naoki prefers to brutally tease Kotoko about everything from her (lack of) grace to her body, publicly rejects her love letter and dismisses her in front of her entire class. Most importantly, he can run circles around her in terms of intelligence. Thus, Naoki is someone who is ‘above’ Kotoko – she’s out of his league and she has to work hard to earn his love. And because melting moments for him are few and far between, it takes a while for the audience to warm up to him.
Everyone agreed that this would provide a hilarious visual for our
Sophie Joy : " I've been needing to get glasses for a while now... I can barely see 5 metres in front of me which is becoming a slight issue. Specsavers were trying to convince me to buy, not one, but TWO pairs of their shitty, shitty frames for a bargain of $60. I kindly refused and I said "These are fucking hideous" and walked out. But these Derek Cardigan frames have definitely taken my fancy. And I also love cardigans which is an added bonus. Make my first pair of glasses the best pair of glasses I'll ever have. LOVE."
198How often must it love, how often hate!
1. I am grateful for the ability to help others whenever possible.
Anyone with allergies to pollen can affirm this for you. I know I can. Luckily there are some ways to beat these seasonal allergies so you can get outside and not totally suffer with a stuffy nose and watery, itchy eyes.
I call this my Chick Chair. I wanted to try the bright looking ASCP Antibes Green because I'd run across a cute grain sack that appeared to be the same shade of green. I had hesitated on purchasing the Antibes Green because it looked too bold, but I was assured it toned down with wax. Okay.
In January 2008, on a whim, blogger Manic Mommy took her three kids and three of their friends with her while she donated blood. Since it was such a cinch with six kids in tow, she wanted to see if she could get others to donate and she spearheaded what she believes to be the first ever virtual blood drive. She convinced 35 blog readers (some of whom had never donated blood in their lives) to donate blood. In all, approximately 100 lives were saved through their combined efforts, and gift cards and various other gifts were awarded to winners. An anonymous blogger even matched the prize money to buy gift cards, and people whom had never donated blood now donate regularly every eight weeks.
An evil clockmaker made a figure so beautiful and lifelike that a clockmaker’s apprentice can’t resist to do evil deeds himself. An unputdownable read!
For now is your chance to change,
Duke University researchers used molecules called microRNAs to convert scar tissue (called fibroblasts) into heart muscle cells in a living mouse, improving the heart’s ability to pump blood.
Why? My mouth went dry.
havn't got back the momentum for baking after CNY... but made some agar agar coz we are having a CNY cum gambling session at J's place tonight!!
The Von Trapp Family Lodge! But I didn't know it at the time. I pulled in, jumped out, and RAN to the lobby. I just wanted to see someone, anyone so long as they were human and awake, to get out of the Twilight Zone I'd been in.
– Young Theseus
Angel Six: “Commercialism. Decadence. Technology run amuck. Remind you of anything?”
In lieu of flowers, memorials may be made to the charity of your choice. Groce Funeral Home, Asheville.
4. Are elites people too?
Wipe a large, nonstick skillet with a paper towel saturated with a bit of olive oil*
Apart of the economic part, is the people ready for ipv6? Iwould say that in terms of knowledge I don´t know so many people who khow that 10.0.0.1 is translated to ipv6 to 2001:0db8:1234::a00:1. From my point of view, I am not ready for ipv6. What about the subnetting tables, classful ranges, etc….
The skunk in question has now decided that the sensor light directly outside our back door is the best entertainment ever and spends each night marching back and forth trying to set it off. Even the dogs are tired of watching.
FDR (glaring at OBAMA): Yes, it is, young man. And I certainly hope he receives a better welcome than I did! (Deeply offended, FDR disappears in a swirl of smoke.)
Yours in health,
Thankfully the friend came to my rescue and challenged Fernando to a game of pool. Inexplicable tension cut, I relaxed, still very confused. Banter continued with The Commando and conversation flowed freely, but again I noticed hesitancy whenever we were approached by any other of my new (male) friends. I chalked this down to his disinterest in their drinking/partying habits and thought nothing more of it.
Happy Wednesday dear friends :)
Snow days are fun when they happen, but not so much fun when our school year is extended by six long, hot, sticky humid days. Tensions are running high. There's bickering, name calling, and general unkindness. There's little sharing going on and a lot of tattling and venting.
assured me), spicy tuna hand roll and sake nigiri. The chef arrived. He
AK: I was surprised by Jacqueline Bouvier Kennedy’s literary talent, her gift for imagery in the short stories, letters, and prefaces she wrote. With Susan Sontag, it was her vulnerability behind the fierce intellectual front, and also the determined way she went about learning French, devising a language method of her own, that took me by surprise. In the case of Angela Davis, I had no idea when I began my research that she became such an important figure for the French. I learned that when she was in prison, awaiting trial, the same writers she had studied as an undergraduate in Paris came to her defense.
With the housing market entering a downturn in 2007, gypsum demand slowed sharply and prices followed, falling 32% over a 20 month period. This returned prices to a level close to their long term trend by early-2008.
MS Birthday Cake art
I like to sometimes take pictures with my phone. If I feel like it, I post those pictures to Twitter, Facebook, etc.
Don't miss Cleese, with a German accent, uttering, "Blimey, how time flies!"
Hmmm. Obviously language is not a barrier and it understands my lingo quite well. Now for the test.
691 D-IV/13/1975. “An Introduction to Shakespeare’s Hamlet.” Course by Stephen J. Vanderslice, Bishop Lynch High School, Dallas, Texas.
“Roger that,” Hood sat down in one of the chairs near the fire. “I think it’s time we made a run to the armory.”
I commit myself to investigating why I only ever take self respect and self dignity so far and then give up on it.
Tracks are -
Colored with Copics
ACCORDIAN BOY! THAT IS WHAT MY SISTER OFTEN CALLS ME BECAUSE I WAS FORCED TO TAKE ACCORDIAN LESSONS AS A BOY. GRRR. I HATED IT. HAVE YOU EVER HAD A FORCED ACTIVITY BESTOWED ON YOU BY A PARENT? YEAH, YOU KNOW WHAT I MEAN.
Not so fast.
She did make it to her appointment last Tuesday at Trinity to have her port flushed. Or rather TRY to have her port flushed - it's still not going through very well. The nurses haven't been able to get a return on her port since I don't know when (probably since her last Doxil treatment). But Dr. Porubcin seems to think it is not a concern yet. It will be a concern if she needs more treatments.
Cervecería Cuauhtémoc Moctezuma, S.A. de C.V. Tecate
iloveRobots is a leading developer of interactive play experiences for children, using today’s most innovative technologies. Though our products debuted in 2009, we got our start more than a decade earlier, building high-tech mobile machines at Carnegie Mellon University’s Robotics Institute. What entranced us more than robots’ ability to do tasks, however, was their power to inspire intelligent engagement and emotional exploration. We experimented with using what we’d learned in the lab to transform everyday experiences. The result? Robotic toys for kids that actually adapt to each interaction and grow as kids grow, taking playtime from fun to magical.
- Oleg Babynin / bass
How will ASA funds be used? For partial funding requests, how will other funds be solicited?
Position Title: RTC Intern
For the wedding, it's tempting because there are so many details to potentially review and refine to go with door #1....which will be fine for something (e.g., the cupcakes) but not so much for other things (e.g., the seating chart). There are so many moving parts to the wedding that I am still trying to strike the balance of paying enough attention to the details without feeling overwhelmed by them.
my pants are not pressed
The dismissal, though, doesn't necessarily mean scrutiny has ended for Mr. Bradley. Your News Now Austin reports that another complaint has been filed against him alleging "the actions of Bradley and others on the state's Forensic Science Commission, resulted in a failure to properly investigate his previous complaints of negligence and misconduct at the Dallas County crime lab, Southwestern Institute of Forensic Science."
And that leads me to a couple of other aspects.
About half the world’s chameleons can be found in Madagascar, so it makes sense to go chameleon watching in Madagascar. Terra Incognita Ecotours runs a 15-day trip for US$5,599 per person.
“I missed my coach home as a result.”
I'll leave you with a picture of the littlest author. (My 5-year old, who lamented that no one wanted to buy his books--for $14, no less. His 8-year-old brother kindly agreed to be his agent.)
it was 2pm, my husband got home at 6 or 7pm. plenty of time to think of a way.. as I calmed myself down enough to call my manager, right when she answered i burst into tears again, and as I did that, my husband walked in the front door, off work nearly 4 hours early. I start running out the front door crying, I havent been able to prepare myself for this enough, but he comes running after me, freaking out asking me whats wrong over and over, he looked like he cared, but it made me wonder if maybe he was just concerned that I had found something else on his computer, or caught him in something. I realized me running away wasnt going to solve anything, so I walked back to the apartment. walked past his open arms, i was still full of anger towards him after what he said "IM FUCKING PREGNANT" is all I could say as I walked past him, into our apartment, before collapsing onto the floor crying again. again, I was happy, but more so afraid of what was going to happen with my marriage.
Dr. Ruth Hart is an attending emergency medicine physician and also a medical coordinator for the New York State Health Department Office of Professional Medical Conduct. While Dr. Hart has been working in the medical field for over 30 years, she still appreciates what it is like to be a brand new doctor.
denim brads
I have previously highlighted Sunday Times columnist Minette Marin’s proposed final solution(£) for Britain’s growing number of elderly people and another article in the same paper linking euthanasia with demographic trends.
“…Let the waters under the heavens be gathered unto one place,…” -Genesis 1:9
48. Tra La La Song
In the present day context, Anna Hazare represented himself as the follower of gandhaian way of life. But, his way of going on a political fast for indefinite period and the dealing of his Team anna, against an elected Democratic Government, to change the whole system on the name of corruption. ,can not be considered a way of Gandhian principles..
- X-man
No matter how rough the seas
(Bad, bad me!)
Here’s hoping next week is filled with surprises.
02. Beyond The Clouds
And then, when resigning and when the prime minister does not accept his guy to be appointed as head of the Shin Bet…
15. Every rope gat two ends. Every story has two sides.
I am so happy to tell you that I lost another pound this week. At first I was disappointed that it was only one pound lost but I have come to the conclusion that one pound lost is better than none. I have had a wonderful week. I ran into TJ Maxx one day on my lunch break and I found a pair of Calvin Klein Jeans that I really liked so I tried them on. They were a size smaller than the smallest jeans I have been wearing so I wasn't sure that they were going to fit. Also they are a slim fit which has always been hard for me to get even in the current size I wear. As soon as I pulled them on I was so excited. They fit, actually they are sort of loose. At this rate of weight loss I will not be wearing them long.
In the month of July I am taking a "road trip" with 3 of my girlfriends and we are driving to and back from Utah. We will be gone 11 days and I am certain we will be laughing, talking, eating, stamping, laughing, talking,.....you get the idea...heehee...I used a Denami image for this card. I colored the car and friends with copics and then cut the whole image out...(darn camera sure shows I didn't do such a good job cutting...). I used pan pal chalks to try and create a scene of sorts on my round background and used some girlie dsp I had gotten from my birthday..Since I love shoes, (as much as I love glitter), I cut out a strip of shoes and used it at the bottom of the card. I used the word border to lay on top of the shoes for the girlie accent. I thought the pearls would add a little umph to the card ...anyway, for the extra part of this challenge, I plan on sending this to my AWESOME AUNT who shares the same birthday month as me. (we are 20 years apart)...and although she isn't a shut in she is one of my heros. She has raised 6 girls and has lots and lots of grand children and great grandchildren. She and my mom (sil) would road trip together to see my dad (her brother), in the nursing home towards the end of moms life. Oh the stories ....heehee...but that is for another time. I saw my sweet aunt this weekend and she raved about my cards and how much she loved them so, am going to pack this one up with a few others and send them her way to wish her Happy Birthday and let her know how much she means to me...I will also, send out a special card to one of our service members who is recovering in the hospital ....after an awful injury...along with a big thank you.
Bionic family (15)
- 12/17/1941: sank the merchant marine ship SS Manini: 2 sailors killed
Then, to my surprise, near the intersection of 7th and California, I saw a bakery with a familiar name, similar to that of my scooter. The place was Kaju and I stopped in to check it out. While the interior is rather nondescript, (uninviting in fact) the owner was friendly and a glance at the food suggested an interesting mix of standard coffee and cookies, scones and the like as well as some uniquely Asian offerings. As a sample, I picked up a triangle of sushi-styled rice stuffed with avocado called onigiri. Wrapped, it was the size of a sandwich and an interesting alternative to the same, easy to throw into my backpack. I also got a house-baked organic chocolate chip cookie. The onigiri has the same mouth feel as the sticky rice used for sushi and was tasty and filling, great fuel for the rest of the afternoon. The cookie was the prize, one of the best chocolate chip cookies I’ve had all year. Nicely chunky, medium sized, crisp on the outside and chewy in the middle. There was a ’roundness’ to the flavor that I loved, but which couldn’t quite identify, that made every bite irresistible. . . could there be a secret ingredient in there?
Now it’s just a very part time because I’m still doing daycare and that will limited me some on a few of the games and activities but when I talked to the bus garage they were thrilled. You see, the manager of the bus garage has known me since my early teens. He’s known me through driving truck, working at the nursing home and now daycare. I see him at least yearly when they make their first few runs of the year and I talk to him yearly because each year my numbers and kids change for the bus pickup/drop offs. All drivers in our district start off as activity drivers. It’s a chance to get a feel of the job without the rush of a timed schedule. Now to do this I already posses a commercial’s driver license so I don’t have to do that I need though to get the endorsements for bus driving and safety and then do some practice driving with their instructor. I think there’s a drivers test too with the bus but wasn’t clear about that. I don’t think I’ll have any problems with any of the driving, now the written test…I’m not good at test, they make me sick really but I will start studying this weekend and hopefully feel able to take the written test next Friday. Oh I have to get a DOT physical too and pay for a background check, about $100.00 above and beyond what I don’t already have but we’ll figure that out in due time.
Overwhelming Marine firepower wiped out two units of Aliens. The three Aliens who had killed the Predator "swordsman" by this time had moved back to control the objective in the northeast. They went to ground, successfully weathering the gunfire directed at them.
ocean and felt like silk. A sharp wit, infectious laugh, and the tenacity of a
And so I draw my sappy conclusion that the giant inflatable bounce house is serving as one giant inflated metaphor for me this week: letting go. I'll watch those little feet disappear for a little while. And after what will be a very, very long day, I'll watch him come back to me; I will take a deep breath, and do it all over again.
Like something from a science fiction film, the angular X-47B steadily taxis onto the runway ready for its maiden test flight.
wouldn’t that be wonderful
Reuben: He made us from dust; He died for us on the Cross; He rose again for us; and that is all I can think of!
God is grieved at the treatment of his daughters. God longs to heal, he longs to bring life, and he longs to bestow power that no man or devil can take away. I really believe that women are called for a special purpose in the Spirit. Deep calls to deep and God is calling his daughters back to make war against the dragon. For it is only the woman coupled with the power of the Spirit that can destroy the goddess and fight for the return of true fertility in the land. Next...finding the 'woman' of God.
a slump and spendage
eBay’s president Devin Wenig of global marketplaces, has said that the UK is eBay‘s fastest growing market. He reported as the number of Britons using the marketplace site had shown “double-digit growth, year-on-year,” that outpaces the average for ecommerce. Online retailers association the IMRG puts that global eCommerce growth at average 15% globally.
At least I'm doing something right!
This was glaringly apparent in UNSTOPPABLE because the trains were not the demons of speed that Tony Scott obviously hoped they would be. So rather than embrace the momentum inherent in the premise of his film, he uses every cheap trick in the book to get those trains moving. (Some of them are embarrassingly cheap – like the shot of the train full of kids headed straight for the runaway train, then cut to safely off to the side, which is odd because there wasn’t an exit ramp in the shot before, but whatever, right?)
The Swing Bridge was built by the Tyne Improvement Commission, under powers conferred by the Tyne Improvement Act of 1861, as part of their overall plan for improving navigation and expanding trade by opening the upper reaches of the river to larger vessels.
The three that I got right: Stranger Than Paradise (1983); Synedoche, New York (2008); The Future (2011)
1) Sift Kao Fen & icing sugar together.
This collection grows from birth, with the opening poem, Moon Landing, all the way through life’s rich experiences (explored with clarity of language and strong metaphors) to The Final Room the last poem in the collection:
would be around to see.
I want you to be who you are. Though it may seem hazier than the four fully formed desires I articulated on our birth night, when I see clearly, this is what I want for him.
I need an everyday in between seasons type wreath because it was definitely time to take down the hearts but feels to early for Easter so I was looking at some wreaths that would work for any season. My faves are below.
The road has always worked magic on us, both individually and as a couple. We’re nomads.
Back on track here...
"The Scarlet Thread"
“These kinds of stories cut me deeply because I see my own life, my own son, my own circumstances, all up in the details,” I wrote on MyBrownBaby in a post that appeared on the morning of March 8. “This is the fear that every parent of a black boy lives with—a fear that grows every year as they age and begin to leave your house without you alongside them. We have to let them go at some point, but it’s so damn hard. And stories like this only make it harder.”
I’ve never been so riddled with doubt up until this point. I love writing, its my life. Yes that was rather cliched and I don’t care because its also a statement of fact.
As a Tulsa woman mourned the loss of her husband a week before his birthday, police and city leaders on Saturday announced the launch of a joint task force to investigate Friday morning's shootings that left three people dead and two others injured.
Tuesday – Cheeseburger Roll-up
Please go to the voting post on our wall, view all the entries and click "LIKE" next to the set you like.
This pastrami sandwich was really tasty, but I have to confess I removed about half the meat before eating. We'll think of something clever to do with it as soon as the appliance guys are out of the kitchen later this week.
About six months ago, I did a first pages intensive workshop at a writer's conference, and I looked at the first two pages of several of my favorite published books, and then I looked at the first two pages of the writers in the workshop and told them where I'd stop reading and why.
Q024) The normal MINZY is what kind of person?
I nearly got fired for poor sales, which would be fair enough, but they didn't. It might not make any difference anyway as I might have landed a new job. Having worked for an insurance company, a double glazing company and a bank I might be going to the other evil group, estate agents! I won't be on the selling side though. They need my skills in property management at the group headquarters. Assuming all goes well and I get it, it will be the first secure monthly wage packet I have brought in since 1983.
Visionary filmmaker Ridley Scott returns to the genre he helped define, creating an original science fiction epic set in the most dangerous corners of the universe. The movie takes a team of scientists and explorers on a thrilling journey that will test their physical and mental limits and strand them on a distant world, where they will discover the answers to our most profound questions and to life’s ultimate mystery.
If I knew you and you knew me.
Personally, I enjoy the "vintage" way of airbrushing. I like the idea of someone physically painting the logo onto the card. It has a more personal feel to it. Plus, I kind of like the quirkiness behind some of the shots.
8 oz mozzarella cheese, grated
Happy Friday everyone :) Our challenge this week at The Outlawz Copic/Promarker group is our regular monthly Anything Goes....a nice easy one for you to play along with....hope to see you there.
A further example is that they strive to deliver their provision in such a way that every session is a sustainable learning experience. They feel that it is more beneficial to train and develop ‘Instructors’ as oppose to Sports Coaches. This is an innovative and forward thinking way of bridging the quality between teaching and coaching. As an ‘Instructor’ the link between teachers, young child and instructor will be strengthened through more in-depth planning,
When this business is in your blood, it's hard to walk away completely. Hence, the beginning of my blog a couple of weeks ago. I appreciate and thank all of you who follow my blog and leave such lovely comments. It may be premature to plan now, but my goal is to start an online shop in conjunction with the blog.
It might sound weird to some folks but my kids are no stranger to a graveyard. They have been many (too many) times in their little lives to visit the same gravestone with the cute old couple sitting on a park bench. They enjoy roaming around looking at each stone and yelling out what's on it. This visit began with Ryan yelling "mom a dog died here!" so I had to explain to them that when somebody dies they put something on their stone that they really like, that person liked his dog.
White, Blue & Red cardstock from the papermill
When rock ‘n roll emerged in Iceland in the mid-fifties, young audiences were thirsty for a change of scenery. Before the war our culture was not very cosmopolitan but after the war teenagers had gotten used to having their own money and wanted to spend it on something more fun (and appropriate) than household needs. Jazz and rock ‘n roll quickly settled in the Icelandic culture and the teeny bopper emerged.
Good sounds and bright lights
Here's "Sixteen Tons":
Almost everyone involved with a psychopath goes through a phase (and form) of denial. It’s very tough to accept the sad reality that the person who claimed to be your best friend or the love of your life is actually a backstabbing snake whose sole purpose in life is humiliating and dominating those around him. Rather than confront this reality, some victims go into denial entirely. They aren’t ready to accept any part of the truth, which, when suppressed, often surfaces in anxiety, projection and nightmares.
Not only that but, most pleasingly, the quality of the bottled beers was genuinely the best I've ever judged in any competition - full stop. This is not to denigrate any other bottled beer competition, I am only speaking as I find - and I, and the other judges, were extremely impressed with the quality of the brews.
You’ll only feel protected when you trust me enough to approach me. No cat. No mouse. No chase.
Next week: more impact evaluation reports. Joy. I guess I better blog about the TAs meeting since it's at least something different.
Today I am still sore
Praise for Pakistan came thick and fast, as did the promise of money. Pakistan is a terrorist state. All of the bombers, terrorists and most of the agitators and proponents of Islam and the desire for a caliphate in the UK come from Pakistan, and we give them money - how mad can you get?
In my essay on King Kong (1933), I suggested that the giant ape’s obvious fakery made it frightening in an otherworldy sense, rather different than the effect won by photo-realistic models, such as those used for Jurassic Park (1993). To make King Kong scary requires deliberate suspension of disbelief on our part, because, while we are looking at an obvious fake, the heroine acts as though the monster is quite real.
You can use her whipped cream recipe also to top off the pudding, or you can do it like Rita Dever and use sweetened condensed milk. Read below for dessert presentation and how to make the caramelized crispies!
I just printed a Boomerang image off the net, and set out a few paper plates with paint splodges and a cotton tip per colour ( paper plates make for easy clean up)
(Bar sampling – sorry no photo.)
He explained that anyone who defies the court order will violate Section 188 of the Penal Code which carries a jail term of six months, a penalty of up to RM2,000 or both.
EuraMedia Summit 2012
You're a freak and a fool giving it the big I am with jokes ripped from the glossiness of cheap magazines,
d) Newcastle is to the north of Sunderland, therefore Sunderland is to the south of Newcastle
It may not be the best movie of the year but it is definitely a fun one.
What I did learn is that this is not my home and that I will face struggles and trials while here on earth. How I respond to those struggles and trials is my choice. God is an active resource in our lives, waiting for our cue for Him to guide, strengthen and even bless us. I learned what the blessings and benefits of belong to Christ are. Do you know what they are?
“The woman’s name?”
This is by far, not the end of it all though – in fact, this is where it starts getting interesting…
She walks forward, more on impulse that anything else, her defense mechanisms seemingly silenced. Defenses. She looks down at her own bare skin and notes that she is no longer covered in sores or seeping pores. She is still naked, but no longer feels the slight chill that even her Manusan physiognomy was finding uncomfortable. Interestingly, her own skin has a reddish tinge in this light, and she wonders if the woman truly is red herself, or if it’s just a trick of the light.
Some questions will be off the wall—only glancingly related to you or your book, or even inappropriate. A short answer is good, but don’t let them hijack the session with questions of no interest to anyone else. The rest of your audience will appreciate it.
Political Union – In which central political apparatus coordinate the economic social and foreign policy of the member states.
The Global Heating Advocate; After reading this remarkable book I have torn up all my scientific papers and I now believe we're heading for an Ice Age. This magazine will close down forthwith.
Whisper the still evening in:
To think that the Federal Reserve system almost went under during the Great Depression, and was then rescued by a Mormon Gadianton, is enough to give even the most stalworth Mormon pause.
Money used for bribery was tax deductible
About 650,000 homes and business were still without power, mostly in northern Alabama and Mississippi, Thursday night, a report said.
What happened? A funny change-up was created between celebrities and politicians and we got all confused and wondering: the gods must be crazy. Today, celebrities invade the media like a giant bible of what-to-dos rather than being busy improving themselves to become exemplary in their fields. They try to impose their fashion and make-up to-dos, they try to convince people to eat at a good and more or less fancy restaurants, make contests to gain followers, and just keep on trying to set norms based on what they think– that they’re all that. And we, we follow them that’s all. Why? because they’re seen nationwide, people think that what they do is what is standardized, so we follow them and those who don’t end up being ‘baduy’ or out of this world.
We twa a sport’d i’ the burn
I’m disappointed in Johnson. The females he wrote in Brick were certainly types, but they were types that he pulled out of the noir films and the high school movies he was toying with, and they rated a lot more attention and care than either Penelope or Bang Bang get. Bloom feels as if a newbie director got in a bit over his head. He wrote himself into a movie that he couldn’t quite figure a smart way out of, and he lost some of his strengths – language and plotting among them – along the way. Still, it’s a sophomore stumble, and I don’t doubt that Johnson has the skills to see his way back to more assured filmmaking.
I recently taught on the historical reliability of the Gospels and the historical evidence for the resurrection of Jesus. One of the areas I focused on was the apparent contradictions and errors in the Gospels, demonstrating how most of these are easily resolvable, and thus not contradictions/errors at all. But not all Biblical difficulties are so easily resolved. In fact, there are some for which I do not presently have a good answer. If you are a careful reader of Scripture, I’d bet there are Biblical difficulties you have encountered for which you lack a good answer as well. What are we to do with such difficulties given the doctrine of Biblical inerrancy? What should our posture be toward the Christian faith once having discovered irresolvable difficulties in the text?
Preach the word; be instant in season, out of season; reprove, rebuke, exhort with all longsuffering and doctrine.
“The fact that so-called Blueberry Hill Farm is being used for questionable trading is exactly why the Firch Lane junction has been so outrageously modified. The size of the vehicles accessing this rural site in the AONB has gradually increased and now seems to include articulated low-loaders carrying plant equipment and road surfacing machines.
“In the process of individuation, the heroic task is to assimilate unconscious contents as opposed to being overwhelmed by them. The potential result is the release of energy that has been tied up with unconscious complexes.”–excerpt from JUNG LEXICON: A Primer of Terms & Concepts by Daryl Sharp
Not only have I been able to promote the MSU branch of Her Campus, I have been able to tweet out the links to each of my writers and my articles to the masses, or at least to our followers. Once I tweet out these links my writers then go on their timelines and retweet them to their followers. It’s this never-ending cycle of social media and in the end we win. We win because new and different people see our hashtag or stumble upon a key word within the tweet and it triggers their interest to look further and to hopefully read our pieces in the end. Just like in this blog post where I can insert a link to one of my articles and.. What?! A little shameless promotion never killed anyone right?..
The February 2012 report is different from the recent pattern. The January 2012 report showed that 1.177 million people were added to the “not in labor force” category. The February 2012 report shows a decrease of 310,000 in the same category. That’s quite a turnaround. Let’s look closer.
So you're probably wondering why I started with February? Well, mostly because I knew I could fill a double page spread with events from that week and I had a little problem with my photos from January so I have to go pull them off my back up drive....anyhoo......onto my pages.
“Water therapy” eh? This could get interesting.
So I do not hear every detail regardless of your discretion
Contact Person: Patrick Keeley
I am thrilled to announce an event that's been years in the making. In partnership with the Philly Roller Girls and The German Society of Pennsylvania, I am launching the first annual Bierfest - Celebrating PA's German Brewing Heritage. We'll have it all:
3. Baby movement
The entry in the Museum Catalogue for the painting reads:
Mr. Swan welcomed the cut as vindication of his budget strategy that is expected to see the substantial fiscal deficit turned into surplus through 2012-13.
then i'm going to ask for a new beach cruiser bike...
I’ll say it again.
Rated NR
Phil Cuneen – synthesiser;
Okay, that sort of explains part of the film's title, but what about "Hell"? How does this made-up netherworld filled with fire and a lacklustre amount of brimstone factor into this froggy tale? Well, it has nothing to do with the place, Hell's a person. Yeah, that's right, his name is Hell, Sam Hell (Roddy Piper), and he's come to Frogtown to ejaculate his potent sperm into the sheathlike structures pulsating between the legs of a fertile group of kidnapped human females.
It causes many people with allergies, severe skin conditions and other diseases just by touching this substance or inhaling it.
It isn’t really important if the things we bump to, stumble upon, or come across are ages ago. It isn’t important if we didn’t do the-things-that- we-know-could’ve-help-us-cultivate-our-current-to-future(longterm)-shit back then. We are what we are now because of the things we did and didn’t do. Stop wishing this and that. Instead, be present and do it now.
Those that dried the bones.
walk...foo fighters
When it comes to wine choices, I chose a red Italian Chianti. Make sure the wine is a robust kind of red — i.e. no tartness and definitely no bitterness. According to The French Chef (DVD), if you were to choose burgundy for the sauce, you would have to change up your wine pairings a little bit.
We already had our latte macchiato and bread-with-chocolate earlier.
As I was making my smoothie this morning, I realized just how handy my Ninja was for this task and how much I enjoyed drinking my daily concoction. Then I started thinking about some of my other healthy eating essentials and thought it would make for a good blog post.
Taman Happy Garden
When the Lord Jesus Christ spoke to Paul, it would be proof of the resurrection. This is something else that would offend the Jews. Oh, yes, the Pharisees believed in the resurrection but at the last day. They indeed denied that Jesus of Nazareth had risen from the dead. Now here was Paul quoting the words of Jesus Christ as he heard them in the temple.
The severe effects of vitamin and mineral deficiencies, such as anemia, cretinism and blindness, have long been known. The report sheds new light on other problems caused by less extreme deficiencies. For example:
Polyester Fiberfill, Needle for assembly & embroidery, Scissors, Stitch marker
I was asked a lot of questions – good questions, hard questions! What was I still doing now that had helped me lose weight? What habits was I still practicing at this point? I came up with drinking water, tracking food, walking 10,000 steps – though I should be MORE diligent with all these. (Just re-ordered a FitBit yesterday as mine went AWOL a few weeks ago and I’ve given up finding it. The good news is that it’s a new and improved version. And this time I think I’m going to pay the modest annual fee for the extra features online, which others have said are helpful.) And in terms of habits, I should have also said weighing daily, and setting goals.
Looks to the path of least resistance
And then today, I completely chanced upon another one. I noticed a guy in HEB carrying a six-pack that was clearly a New Belgium product, but not one I had ever seen before. And as I've noted before, just seeing that familiar red label on that peculiar brown bottle with the ring around the neck is all the recommendation I need. And sure enough, it's a winner. It's called 2 Below Ale (actually, it's 2 [degrees] Below Ale, but blogger won't allow me to make that little superscript circle), and it has a rich, warming flavor. Hints of orange, drizzled in brown sugar and butter, and heavy on the roasted malts. Mmmm.
Green brought her two granddaughters, Audrey Cole, 3 and Shelby Cole, 6, with her to Morgan Central Elementary School where the Red Cross had set up a Service Center to provide resources for tornado survivors. The girls and their parents also lost their home to the storm. Green said the horse and the rest of the family’s animals except for one dog that was killed were okay and being tended by West Liberty veterinarian Dave Fugit. They included a cat with a broken leg and a cat with a broken jaw, but otherwise, the injuries were not too severe.
It's a lie, and, in most respects, it always was.
Now you may be thinking something like “its hard to only think about positive thoughts all the time”. Which may be true to a degree, yes negative thoughts are going to come. Its natural human nature, so yes you will have negative thoughts. However there is a way to beat those negative thoughts and get your attention off of them. The next time you have a negative thought pop up, you notice it and you say “Thank You For Sharing“. You politely take your attention away and come back to the present moment and give yourself the ability to focus on whatever thought you choose.
I grew up with stones, rune stones, dolmens, and a grand mother who took us round "our" island in Denmark, to see them, first on bicycles, later in cars, we visited these stones almost every trip I made to the island. My grandmother worked in the local museum, and was familiar with not only the big stones, but also the shards found in the fields, of ancient arrow heads in flint, of which we had serious collections as children. Stones, for me, also an integral part of the beach, not the sandy stretches we are familiar with here, but wild, wave and wind swept beaches, where winter determined next summers best bathing spot, never the same. There, eyes firmly on the ground, we looked for "rassle stene", perfectly round pieces of flint, with a small hole, where the water got in to clean away the limestone, around the kernel of flint in the middle, this made them rattle, hence the name, and we priced them enormously. More so, than the dolmens. For a child, a treasure in the pocket, means more than any sense of history. Later in life, as an adult, I return time and time again to those dolmens, for me, who grew up without a real sense of roots, that place meant that many feet had walked where I now stood, and coming every year, was as close as I could get to "coming home".
This is not like the liturgy of the Mass, where the ritual comes from the Apostles and is intrinsically pleasing to God because in the Mass the Son of God is offered to the Father (this is why the Mass is still objectively pleasing to God even if the priest is sinful or the Mass is said privately without a congregation). The problem is that we assume that these other customs (Negro Spirituals) that have vitality within their own religious setting will produce the same results when transferred to Catholic worship. This ignores the fact that the inner vitality of these customs within their own tradition is due to their cultural context, not the merit of the act itself. It also presumes that the Mass, which has a supernatural origin and is ordered towards God, needs the inclusion of these foreign customs that have only a natural goodness, even within their own tradition. These are the problems with transplanting customs from one religious setting to another.
The purple, not blue, LOL satin ribbon is from Walmart.
Thank you! Your donations are tax deductible for 2012. If you prefer to send a check rather than give through PayPal, write it and mail it to: I Am 2 Partners, Inc., c/o 3678 Creekstone Drive, Norcross, GA 30092.
Some of you are sitting out there thinking, “I don’t know that I have ever really been in love with Jesus. I’ve been here in church my whole life, but it has always been about the rituals and rules.” That’s cool. Let’s fix that. There is a whole new life out there waiting for you.
There are “Administrators,” folks who might be akin to the folks we call “Church Leaders.” Two things are worth noting here, I think. First, Wikipedia’s Administrators do not see their role as setting the agenda. They don’t think they’re in charge. In fact, they’ve been known in the vernacular as “janitors,” because their primary function is to clean up after everyone else. It is stressed that these leaders, these Administrators, are fundamentally just users, editors, no different than anyone else. The one difference is that they’ve taken on the task of making sure that everyone else has what they need to do their work.
illustrates his point with a similar vanishing act, only he wasn’t
Working in a strip club or any kind of nightclub environment for that matter, it's not as easy to turn down a customer who REALLY wants their dancer, cocktail waitress or bartender to drink with them. It's a loud, party environment. If a customer wants to buy a staff member a drink and the staff member turns them down, they will take it personal. Money talks in a strip club. The customer will take their money to someone who WILL drink with them. Trust me, I've seen it a million times. Drunk people are not rational, remember?
CarpeDiemStore.com and DickBlick.com are reputable online dealers for Copics. Carpe Diem offers free shipping starting at $50 purchases while Dick Blick requires $150. However, Dick Blick offers discounts with larger purchases. Carpe Diem is missing a few of the new Ciaos and Dick Blick has some backordered colors. DickBlick.com is a Google trusted site with purchase protection.
So what about you? How do you think you would do in an alien/zombie/robot invasion?
So enjoy! Lossless FLAC, of course.
What is most remarkable about this film, in my opinion, is its ability to balance both the heavy and the light. It uses a score incredibly reminiscent of Peter and the Wolf, as it moves bombastically and menacingly in places, while it can be bird-like and cuckoo-esque in other portions. Similarly, the film begins by using concessional visual gags and visually witty graphics in scenes which break boundaries and destroy concepts of times, while by the time it reaches the end, it has become a visual cacophony representing the shift in attitudes both father and son are experiencing.
The Jewish community is far too smart to fall for his Hypocrisy. It seems that his speeches change according to whoever he is speaking to. He supports Israel when he needs the Jewish vote, however, the White House said the U.S. will press for a Palestinian state quickly if President Obama is re-elected..Told ya.
The doctor asked her next.
Like this one time, pretty soon after I'd graduated from college, I was totally unemployed and had been for months. I was doing some lame ass temp work, but had no permanent prospects anywhere on the horizon. So what did I do? Pulled out the credit card and booked a trip to Seattle to visit my friend Julie who'd moved there a few months prior. I remember the distinct feeling of "I really shouldn't do this" followed quickly by the uncommon feeling of "You know what? FUCK it! I'm doing it!" I booked that sucker, and went and had a blast. We even took an excursion to Vancouver, B.C. (back when a driver's license could get you over the border and back in, no problemo). In fact, I was having so much fun (and had no real commitments to get home to) that I wasn't ready to leave when the time come, so I called and changed my ticket so I could stay a couple more days. And yes, I charged the change fee to my credit card. It took my unemployed ass a LONG time to pay off that trip, but I still remember it fondly.
2. The Fakir I (5:35)
The mini album kit only included the album and some paper to paste on the chipboard pages so what better way to embellish the album then to use some Karlas001 products!
A Princess is born was created from the desire to play with my new Copic Markers that were recently acquired..........thats a whole new addiction that I will have to post on later. So all the doodling is my freehand doodles. Don't tell anyone but all the stickers, cardstock and ribbon are sooooooooooooooo old that I can't even vaguely remember where they came from or what product line they belong to. My goal for this album is to scrap with scraps and stash and I am pleased to be successful so far.
Cliff (High ???) is also a webmaster and his site is called halfpasthuman.com. It's uncertain if High is actually is name but he did state so in an interview on Coast to Coast radio so one as to assume that it is. Why the secrecy one might ask and the answer may be that people who have too much knowledge sometimes disappear. Alien abduction perhaps but highly doubtful....
You know me, always adding something to my plate.
Rnd 1)ch3, 11dc in 3rd ch from hook, sl st to top of first dc (not beginning ch)
as doors
It’s a place where our kids can go to cry.
Mobile telephones, land lines and Internet connections in some parts of Homs were cut off Wednesday. Many people were staying home because of roads blocked by security forces. Others were too scared to leave.
When up steps a feller and he says, "Say, my lad,
"It looked nicer round your neck." She said.
The train station at Curriehill is no more than a halt just outside the town so to get to Balerno required a 5 minutes walk up to the main A70 Lanark Road followed by a bus which dropped me off just past Balerno High Street. A Farmer's Market was just being taken down on the pedestrianised High Street and opposite this was the well kept Grey Horse Inn (nice modern web-site).
I concur. In my experience, conservatives do not quibble with the scientific method as a way to advance knowledge. But they distrust the intermediaries between the scientists and the public - the journalists and good-government activists who purport to interpret the findings of the "scientific community" - who frequently minimize the uncertainties in the science and extrapolate to policy conclusions not supported by science.
And psh, I'm not accusing agents of having some sort of fault. Their taste in books helps them be truly passionate about the projects they DO take on. Would you really like an agently omnivore who says, "Meh, might as well represent this project. I'm not super into the genre, but it's well-written, I guess." or one who says, "I was just thirsting for a ghost story set in the 70s! I will CHAMPION this!"
Thanks for stopping by to celebrate with Dara and remember to comment on each post during her blog tour for more chances to win! (Not sure what I’m talking about? Click here for more details.)
Yeah, it's one thing or another
Whatever, I guess. Think too hard about this stuff and TREK becomes as solid as wafting smoke from a dying fire.
We all die.
Sims, a highly-touted four-star member of the Tide’s 2010 recruiting class and a Virginia native, could apply for a NCAA waiver that would allow him to compete for UVA right away. Otherwise, he’ll have to sit out a year to fulfill transfer rules.
Add eggs, one by one, beating thoroughly.
If all this seems a little too “new age” or “out there” for you, it may interest you to know that science is coming to my defense: in a recent “Editor’s Choice” article published in MyNews24, the user-generated section of News24.com, a scientist summarized recent findings about the quantum nature of consciousness which have led researchers to the conclusion that consciousness “is a foundational, irreducible component of reality”; in other words, it exists outside of the body, and therefore may persist from one life to the next.
Barcelona!
No one but You in Spirit and Truth
Meanwhile a Moroccan international striker Bouchaib El-Moubarki claims he could be on the verge of joining Stoke City as revealed in today’s Sentinel.
FEELS GREAT TO BE BLOGGING!
Aid agencies say a malnourished child can be nursed back to health in just a month, but the difficulty of getting supplies to trouble areas is hurting those most in need.
It's required.
I'm tired of winter-- hence the new background. As part of my effort to pretend it's summer, I tatted Karey Solomon's hummingbird, from her book Make Many Merrily.
her shield, I my bow-
It is the kind of idea that comes later to most people. Decades pass, one walks through a darkened room in which someone has died, and suddenly one recalls long forgotten words and the roar of the sea. It’s as if those few words had captured the whole meaning of life, but afterwards one always talks about something else.
Generally, I have to say I am not a fan of the work of Judd Apatow, producer of The Five Year Engagement. Though I appreciate the sharp and witty dialogue, I prefer my romance without Apatow’s signature drunken vomiting, potty humor and crude guy talk, all of which appear in this film. The Five Year Engagement also runs too long, with a rambling chronology. On the other hand, the film centers on a real and bittersweet exploration of the dilemma for both partners over work, geography, and marriage.
Presumably the thinking was – as a matter of courtesy – that he should learn about the decision from the party, not from the media or third parties, but we believed he should not be woken.
You see it two at a time, even though it's essentially a private experience. I should say at the outset that my theatre partner totally enjoyed himself. He said it was like one of his dreams: and indeed its brief, strange narrative is something like a dream. I didn't enjoy myself nearly so much. Among other things, only the week before I saw the extraordinary Oráculos, a genuinely profound work of immersive theatre. It's almost an unfair juxtaposition, because it draws the differences between the two works so starkly, especially in their thinking about imaginative and sensory stimuli.
For all my teaching friends who continue to fight the fine fight in inner city teaching, my hat goes off to you.
I hope you have beautiful dreams today!
Isn't religion - the freedom from and the freedom of - one of the bedrock Five Freedoms? How can we seriously be considering depictions of religious life in fiction as objectionable? Thus, when I ran across a piece decrying The Mysterious Disappearance of Religion in YA Fiction, my ears perked up.
But diamonds,
1156 **D-III/24(B)/1993. “The Future of Liberal Democracy.” The School of Law, Oklahoma City University, Oklahoma City, Oklahoma. Panel chaired by Andrew C. Spiropoulos. (Incorporated in Item C-1995(4), pp. 25-33.)
Some may say we are "buying" your support. We'd rather think of it as being selfless by giving something to you.
I'm not making any concrete goals, but I have some wishy washy goals that I'm going to (very loosely) keep to myself. But, for heaven's pete sakes, I want something on the walls already.
37 Le Forte Four - The Lowest Form of Music
"The Worldwide Dessert Contest: Enhanced Multimedia Edition" features all the text of the 1998 Orchard Books release, as well an original musical score from the play that the book inspired. Read the story, then click on a link to listen to the companion songs in this cutting edge, one of a kind, 21st Century children's fantasy novel from Alina Adams Media!
Obviously, the two Royles are frequently confused. What I didn't know until this event was that Nick Royle the academic had written about Nick Royle the novelist, and had delivered a conference paper about him. This was at a University of London conference, and the two of them had arranged to meet there, but in a kind of publicly theatrical way. Nick mark 1 delivered the paper, and then stepped down from the platform, shook hands with Nick mark 2, who stepped up to take questions on his own novel. An uneasy silence ensued...
And here I stand
Add diced onion, pepper, mushrooms & garlic
peanut butter oreo cakesters (that look like mini whoopie pies) are my new faves! and dont you hate it when you forget to hand out party favors? those fall-scented candles in canisters were treats for the adults! sorry guys. got carried away with the endless chatter and laughter!
Can I tell you a secret?
All in all though, an acceptable alternative to cooking lager.
Only to realise, why none of us knew, any more than we saw,
Philosophy’s answer goes like this: God is not part of the flow of time as Boethius or, indeed, as any mortal sees it. God looks upon the world from a mountaintop, and beneath Him is spread all that Was, Will Be, and Is, existing for Him as a kind of eternal Present. He is able to perceive of all time simultaneously. Thus, He can look down at what any one person is doing now, see how it relates to what they have done, and then see how it will lead to what they will do. Presumably, when taking quantum physics into account here, God would be able to see the outcomes of all possible outcomes of all possible actions, viewing them simultaneously, and thus be omniscient without really interfering with an individual’s decision-making process. This idea is echoed in Grendel’s discussion with the Dragon in Gardner’s Grendel, as well as the Architect of The Matrix: Reloaded.
Though the town below lay leaved with October blood.
Content kings are primarily male users who play games online, download music and film from the Internet, and watch TV online.
For young men, it's a picture of a lady with a nice derriere but only the most observant will notice that she is crossing a street.
This is a test file designed to compare later-on with some different editing software...but as it's probably not on CD then might as well make this available.....as it's also a rather uncommon set. The performance-style is not particularly to my taste !!
Police also recovered several guns inside the home. Police said the guns were also purchased through classified listings.
Now I like to do all kinds of paper crafting, card making, altered art, knitting & sewing.
WE also tied in poetry to this project – so in the ePubs there are haiku written by students about their explorers. We were going for figurative language, so there is a bit of that included as well.
Proponents of neotame claim that increased toxicity is of no concern because less of it is needed to achieve the desired effect.
Right now I have 3 in cloth – a 7 month old girl and a 2-year-old boy in diapers, and then a 4 year old in cloth trainers. Because I'm used to cloth diapering and my routine is set, I don't find it difficult. There are a few things that have made it easier for me. (1) My 2 year old is very “regular” so I get a Bumkins liner in there around the time I know the mess is coming! (2) My 7 month old is exclusively nursed and I took the advice of other experienced mothers who said they never rinsed the EBF poo and just let the machine handle it. (3) I use one-size covers so I can grab anything and it will basically fit anybody! (4) For my potty training I switched to the Flip Training Pants which are incredible because they are one of the only ones in the market that are “wipe and re-use.” Saved me tons of money and laundry!
I'm also down to the last of the Oak-aged Whisky Barrel Imperial Stout that I brewed on Dec 26, 2005. It is almost perfect, so I bottled some for posterity. The Hop Harvest IPA is doing fine. It's slightly unbalanced and overly-hopped (to me), but my friends always go for that tap handle. I still have about 3 pints of the May 5th Big Brew Day "Poor Richard's Ale" (18th-century period beer) left. I need to feed it to my neighbors (or drink it myself), to give me some tap room.
I recently wrote about some of the oddities in the naming of Ohio cities, towns and villages. As I mentioned previously; creativity appears not to have been a forte of early Ohio settlers. I can understand how, over time, as a state’s map becomes more dotted with named places, providing a unique name for one’s town would become more difficult. That’s probably why so many towns seem to be named for the obvious.
Special Events
Blood Angels
Week 10-@ Minnesota Vikings-1:00pm-November 11, 2012
Near-hire Training (for Potential Call Center Agents)
“……anything in particular?”
Peter Thorton and his lover set out on a quest to rescue a captive duke who is the pretender to the throne of Portugal. Thorton is arrested and placed on trial for desertion and sodomy. Men of Honor continues the further adventures of a gay officer during the Age of Sail, replete with perils, excitement, and nautical detail. Alex Beecroft, author of ‘False Colors,’ says it’s “a book which can stand comparison with C. S. Forester’s Hornblower.”
“Debilitated by internal political divisions and external pressures, the Karzai government is poorly positioned to cut a deal with leaders of the insurgency. Afghanistan’s security forces are ill-prepared to handle the power vacuum that will occur following the exit of international troops…To avoid another civil war, a major course correction is needed”, The International Crisis Group, 26 Mar 2012,
Investigations into the company now show that, to save costs it used industrial-grade silicone (the kind used in mattresses) instead of medical-grade silicone in implants surgically inserted into hundreds of thousands of women. The implants are raising red flags that the cheaper silicone is more likely to cause leakage and raise a woman’s risk of cancer. Duping women and potentially jeopardizing their lives in the name of profits is a serious and misogynistic violation against women.
I can only hope that retailers go back to the old ways of business. Reciprocity has become passé in so many segments of our current culture, especially in the retail world.
CEO of the Adyan Foundation and Maronite priest, Fadi Daou was the first expert to speak against the motion, and he presented his opposition on the basis of three points.
I give you Jane's closet as an example. She has, in her 11 months on this earth, had more clothes than Matt and I have had put together in the last 20 years. She also outgrows them overnight. It. Is. Unbelievable.
Today the Mother of prospective World Leader Mr F is pleased to announce an amnesty for anyone who hasn’t so far followed her blog, thus saving them from being interned for political re-education in the usual way.
For in many ways The Death of Klinghoffer is more a reflection on the infamous Palestinian hijacking of the cruise ship Achille Lauro in the Mediterranean in 1985, and the subsequent death of one of its passengers, the Jewish, wheelchair-bound Leon Klinghoffer, than a depiction of the event itself. It's the absence of that narrative element in the text, and the effect that has on the music which Adams composed, that robs the work of a real dramatic spine. For the first act at least the score seems much closer to oratorio than opera, with much more meditation and recollection than real-time action, and the overwrought imagery and sheer opacity of Goodman's text only exacerbate it. The pace quickens in the second half – a narrative thread more or less runs through it – and the dramatic focus is sharper, but the final impression is blurred.
Share a picture which means JOURNEY to you!
Me: Well I think that's what he says. It goes, "la, la, la, la, dum-de-dum-de-dum...when I kiss you, on your cheesy lips'
To preach the message of the gospel is the central mission of the church for all people to hear and know about Christ crucified. If anything contrary is added to the gospel or any truth taken away from it, then one must question the legitimate authority of that teacher, prophet or shepherd.
My mother would have LOVED this morning, on the national mall, watching the final flight of the space shuttle Discovery. I thought of her often, standing in the dust, surrounded by a bunch of highly convivial folks who, like me, really wanted to see this thing that has been coming and going from earth to space for 27 years, piggy-backed on a 747. We cheered as the shuttle circled the mall. We smiled. We took a million pictures.
“I acted badly. April 13th is a bad date on the calendar for me. And I don’t know how to avoid it. I get done with it and then the whole year careens back to it,” he said.
I’m so thankful for all of the images and for the video of my sweet little princess. These pictures of her while she’s safe, warm, happy (even smiling!), content and loved are absolute treasures. We also got a teddy bear with a recording of Nora’s heartbeat. Greta picked out a soft pink bear for her little sister. I’m so so glad we decided to do this!! I’m very happy today!
So I am working on getting into my new groove.
Sam laughed, fighting her way out of their embrace. "I can't breathe." She tried to gather her hair back but soon gave up. Who cared what she'd look like in the photos, anyway. She was going to Xenith, where the best athletes in the world prepared for the Olympics. And Mum would be there.
A few good pinches sea salt
If you are an enthusiast just like I am, and want to take the chance to win three lovely colors (your choice!!!) of this Aussie brand nail polish, run! Good luck for you and me!
Anyway, back to polishing. I will post pics later of the shiny bits.
Well, then I went to get my copies of Barry's books signed, and I told Barry what a brilliant writer I thought he was, not caring if he thought I was a suck, and he looked ridiculously pleased, and it was like some kind of literary love-in. And then The Partner, who was standing right beside The Bitch, said,'Tell him about your father's ewe.' For god's sake! (These people at signings, wanting to come up and identify, and tell you their life stories!) But Barry was looking curious now - or was that glazed? - and out of embarrassment, The Bitch told him.
Bessacarr & Cantley
I couldn't even look back. My heart was being torn out of my chest.
Dr Hatta reminded Malaysia Chronicle that PR’s Buku Jingga is a precursor of the election manifesto of Pakatan Rakyat and an economic congress will be organised after the Sarawak polls, to engage with the rakyat on the topic of economy.
The descriptions of her preparations to travel to France, the journey and her early days in Versailles make captivating reading. Maria Antonia becomes engaged to a man that she has never met, has never seen, and doesn't really know anything about. She waits anxiously for months for a miniature portrait of Louis-Auguste to be sent to her, and a painter comes from France to paint a portrait of her to be sent to Versailles. Through the marvels of Wikipedia we too can see her likeness.
Jason Matthew Coffey, 25, Newburgh, N.Y.
I don´t have much to say, today. This week has been already better than the last weeks, because Betty´s daughter arrived and she already started helping me with the kids, specially Hannah. I was able to leave home this afternoon and knowing, that my daughter still would get her homework done. I´m so thankful, that she came to help me here.
What follows is are a few tasting notes on a few "mainstream" beers I wanted to try. A few of you have told me that you'd like to see my review of Michelob Ultra. I did in fact drink one of these several years ago, but did not realize it was beer until I finished. More like carbonated, unfiltered tap water from the back of chicken farm. The Miller Lite someone gave me a several years ago did not taste like beer at all, and all the politeness in the world could not make me finish it. A neighbor gave me a Steel Reserve one hot day last summer, but found it quite devoid of character, though it did give me a little buzz. Which is really what mainstream lagers are about, so I guess that one could be considered a success.
Monthly IWSG Linky-thingie
HA!
Also, I like positivity and am not really a fan of people who chart all their rejections and struggles in the slush pile. Save that for when you have been published.
The word used here, “steward,” denotes one who has charge of a house, and rules, divides, and arranges everything in it; one, too, who gives gifts and remits debts, when he believes sincerely that to do so would be pleasing to his lord, or make for his honour and advantage. His chief virtues are prudence and faithfulness. So does the Pope, as steward of the Church and vicegerent of Christ, ordain everything, grant indulgences, and dispense with vows.
The loosely consolidated trail surface makes for some challenging hiking — particularly on the initial uphill portion of the trail, which eventually enters a quite scenic steep-walled sandstone canyon system. Once ensconced within these walls, you are officially in the Indian Well Wilderness Area.
* With 1.3 million civil servants to a population of 26 million, Malaysia has one of the highest civil servants-to-population ratio in the world by the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development standards.
One such other place is in Revelation 4-5 where everything spoken of is spoken of in relation to the throne. Who is on the throne, in the center, but Jesus. “Then I saw a Lamb, looking as if it had been slain, standing in the center of the throne, encircled by the four living creatures…”
There are many more questions that predators can ask and from speaking with these predators directly the list is endless, but the questions presented above are some of the most common ones they ask.
May 17 – Oxford, MS – Proud Larry’s
It's pretty twee sounding stuff today, but in their own way, they must have been pretty revolutionary at the time. They may not have known it, but they certainly did their bit to pave the way for the pioneers of Rhythm and Blues in the late 40's.
now we come to its display..
"Walking Boss" - The Damnations. Hell yeah.
Of the two, the news from Malaysia where three women were caned for illicit sex was by far the most disturbing.
Mr Wight formally appeared as a Crown witness in November 2010, being called as such as a matter of courtesy to the defence. This meant that once Mr Wight had confirmed his name, address, age and occupation, Mr Sheridan took up his cross-examination immediately. If Mr Sheridan had not wanted him to give evidence, then the Crown would not have called him at all. This has less of a bearing on any possible perjury case against Mr Wight, but limits the value to Mr Sheridan in his appeal in the event that Mr Wight was found to have given perjured evidence.
One week ago today, Matt moved out of our house and into the apartment that he will be sharing with Kylee after they're married. (Six weeks!) My baby has taken one more step towards being completely on his own. It could have been a traumatic day, but it wasn't. Mostly because I've seen him almost every day since then. And because he still hasn't moved all of his belongings out of our house.
And earth wore the surplice at morn,
The Rule of Law
"One thing I wanted to ask you. Tracey and I have been talking about this. I started with oral chemo and ended with intravenous. From what we can make out, we doubt the chemo made a bit of difference. Not in a positive way, anyway. What do you think?"
In college I was able to make the transition into the person I am now. The added six inches in height, Accutane medication and development of a personality helped. Plus, I had a car! This was new territory for me, and it was quite awesome. Instead of sitting in Chemistry class staring at girls' thongs from my chair I was able to talk to chicks without peeing my pants and running away while crying uncontrollably. And of course, alcohol helps.
any time one pretext disappears, there is another one ready at hand
so you can rebuild me
was a big heart: Abelardo’s. At the end of the 60’s and the early 70’s, Abelardo’s view of Chicanos and mine were identical though I expressed my view principally in prose. After World War II, during my studies at the University of Pittsburgh, I had aspirations to be a poet. I wrote much poetry during the 50’a and in the early to mid 60’s read my works with many El Paso poets including Abelardo Delgado and Jesus Rafael Gonzalez. And though I joined Cesar Chavez’s efforts early in the 60’s, I was not a Chicano poet -- I was a Chicano
9 New Born Blues
I then cut some green felt with a new Marianne Design cutting die in a lattice effect
So now I'm a beer mixologist, along with whatever other dubious accolades I hold (I just listed them to my wife) and indeed the very first Polak/Brit/Knaresborian on the Beermixology site. My first post is the most successful beer cocktail from our current range, Ladies and Gentlemen the Brooklyn Baltic.
In conclusion part two, never listen to people on streets holding signs, unless they are the police or one of those old lady crossing guards with the big lollipop stop sign. In those cases, I will leave it up to you to decide if you want to buy what they are selling.
Connie Hedegaard, the E.U. climate commissioner, has said that Europe tried for more than a decade to achieve a global solution before adopting its own system.
Those who have strayed from their christian faith, those who have never had a faith and those who protested that the faith was being taught in the State schools are all having a paid long weekend built on the christian faith.
Often they would not truly realise the full benefits of old friends until their dying weeks and it was not always possible to track them down. Many had become so caught up in their own lives that they had let golden friendships slip by over the years. There were many deep regrets about not giving friendships the time and effort that they deserved. Everyone misses their friends when they are dying.
And it seems that the medium-length-necked surviving type also carried foreward adaptations making it able to tolerate both coldwater and freshwaters better than the more specialized Elasmosaurs.
This extends to completely ignoring the events of the first film, for all but that this starts roughly where that finished. The Hulk’s origin is retold in the opening credits and has been redone to be much more like the one in the TV show. The whole movie has been structured so as not to confuse people who only know the Hulk from the small screen – even Ed Norton’s hair has been redone to be much more like Bill Bixby’s (Bixby played Banner on the telly) – while still catering to purists who prefer the comic version. The movie covers all its bases to the extent that, at one point, Jack McGee and Jim Wilson (supporting cast from different parts of the franchise) cameo in the same scene. Their appearance, like that of Doc Samson (bear with me, normal people), is pretty much an in-name-only affair, solely calculated to push fanboy buttons.
Rudolph Valentino remains one of the really instantly recognizable names in film history, even to those with only a fleeting interest in the subject. His reputation as a romantic idol of the silent screen is well entrenched even after almost 90 years since his untimely passing.
can we talk about phobias for a second? we all have them, some more odd than others. i think i've mentioned this here before, but my phobia is...
Schroeder HA, Mitchener M. Toxic effects of trace elements on the reproduction of mice and rats. Arch Environ Health 1971; 23: 102-106.
The other day I was playing around and ended up reading both your LiveJournals. I found this fun survey that we did on each other in our early dating days. These posts are dated 04/08/2005 ... less than a month since we started dating.
3. There will be a lottery for extremely limited, hand bottled, hand numbered barrel aged variations. Guests will exchange their event tickets for a Golden Ticket with a scratch off section. If their ticket scratches off as a winner, they will have the opportunity to purchase one bottle of one of the four variations in addition to the 4 bottles of Darklord. The variations are:
They have compost, squash (SIGH - we winterized everything before the big freeze but forgot to bring the squash stored in the greenhouse inside.....so we have a pile of mushy once frozen squash to feed the chickens....) and I pick a bucket of grass/chickweed for them every day. They love their greens....Today we got 14 eggs from 14 chickens!
The Mormons can pack up and go home
There were complaints that some people outside were telling voters who to vote for and that one person was led to a polling booth at the Indian Community Centre, in Rawdon Street, by a candidate's supporter.
The second reason I refer to myself as “Mother” is because other people have always done so. This phenomenon was a natural occurrence due to my personality. Literally, years ago, when I used to bartend – the other waiters would call out, “Momma, I need two strawberry daiquiris and a margarita STAT.” Momma, me, would make them their drinks and give them a hug if they were ever stiffed on a table and needed a shoulder to cry on. It’s just my nature. I was born to stick up for the little guy, nurture, fight for what’s right, and love. It’s also important to note that although I am not black, most of my friends will tell you – I am a strong, black, woman inside – much like Kathy Griffin. I don’t know why that is. But, then again tell me how in the hell Adele and Dusty Springfield sing like that while also being completely deficient in melanoma and I think you’ll have your answer. Momma’s got soul.
Dowd: Santorum will not maintain his stickiness
I'd build self-esteem first, and the house later.
Sergeant Wayne called to the rest of his squad “fire everything you’ve got and keep it busy”. Then he calmly spoke to the gunner “take your time and hit it where it hurts”. The squad fired their heavy laser rifles in short controlled bursts. Most of the shots ricocheted of the building, but they succeeded in distracting the monster long enough for the gunner to take careful aim. His shot found a gap in the wall and struck the creature cleanly on the back. However, despite leaving a smoking scar where the beam burned through the creatures armour, it seemed unaffected.
5.Basement
But it doesn’t have to be that way. Turkey Burgers CAN taste good, but we have to dispell the notion that they are taking the place of beef or should try to taste like beef burgers in the first place. No, to make a Turkey Burger taste good, it requires some outside the box thinking.
Mantracker. I sat down and watched an episode a few weeks ago, and I've been hooked. It so good! I feel like I would want to try it out just to see how far I could go before being surrounded by 2 horses and a scary man :D. But yeah, it's amazing. It's one of the ways my dad and I bond these days. I'll come down every night and we'll watch TV, something on discovery, the science channel, or the food network (Which is always amazing).
Le Duc and I typically rent an apartment when we visit Paris, now that longtime local friends have downsized from family homes or retired to other cities.
I hope the President don’t talk too much the way he talk now. If he has nothing to talk then he better shut up. Being the President, he should act the way the people expect him to be. President Noynoy Aquino should act like President!
Thinking that our dialogue would probably head into matters of marital satisfaction, I had carefully prepared my words on the subject: everything was fine, I just needed some academic stimulation, and so forth. But interestingly, the subject never surfaced and I was left with thoughts about the inner lives of men versus women. If the situation had been reversed, I think I would have wondered.
10. Hold Your Head Up (White, Argent) 11:16
Grief: Family members of Fakhra Younus cannot hide their anguish at Karachi airport as the acid attack victim’s body was returned to Pakistan
Our adult goat, Violet, came to us with minor bumps on one of her udders which we were told were nursing scars. Unfortunately, the bumps continued to grow over the past month and I finally accepted the fact that these bumps were not mere scar tissue. So, I called our friend Jane -- who is the original owner of the goat -- and told her that we needed an expert goat handler to come down and take a look-see at these bumps and counsel us on what to do.
If you didn't know this, I am a HUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUGE fan of BIGBANG, especially TOP, so when I heard that of ALL BANDS in the world, of ALL PLACES IN THE WORLD, BIGBANG are coming to BELFAST my initial reaction was....
If that doesn’t do it for you, I’m sure you could find something to like on Video’s Leather, Leather LP. Featuring most of the dudes in Wax Museums/Wrists/Bad Sports/Wiccans etc, Video delivers a knockout punch with their debut. Possibly the first band I would unequivocally state are “Final Solutions-influenced,” Video bring that gnarly, catchy, vaguely sci-fi, totally KBD-damaged punk rock that has been one of the defining sounds of the last 10 years of underground rock (at least to those with a modicum of taste, I can’t speak for the Sufjan Stevens fans out there). They do it as well as anyone else, and certainly better than anyone going these days (minus HE o’ course). I really love the huge fuzzy bass that slices thru this record like a jeep-mounted machine gun, mowing down anything in its path. This band rules; come up North and rock some faces off, lads.
11. Mockingbird Girl
My next session of the year was a mini session for baby Austin as part of his Baby's First Year series of sessions with me. This was his 4-month session, and he had definitely found his hands by then! He loved eating his fingers!
MARI
Ted quickly stops off and grabs a sandwich and I dash ahead to gloat.
In a large bowl, with your hands, mix together the peanut butter, butter, sugar, and vanilla. Make sure it’s thoroughly combined and mixed. Wash your hands. Roll the mixture into balls and drop onto a wax-paper lined baking sheet. Freeze for one hour.
06/24 - Vancouver, BC GM Place
Bill Direen / Journal Entry on Repatriation / 19
My grandpa died.
That which you sense is only to be known,
For the most part, none of the children seem to have any residual scarring for this emotional event.
As summarized by Canada Stockwatch, U.S. prosecutors alleged that the brothers manipulated Fairmont from 30 cents to $3.10 in early 1993. They also alleged that Robert paid secret commissions to U.S. brokers to induce their clients to buy the stock. The brothers then dumped their shares for combined profits of $560,000.
Accountability is a way of safeguarding your life!
One point that I have made myself clear, and at least to a friend thru Facebook before the Prime Minister of Malaysia presented the Budget 2011 on last Friday 15 October was, regardless of the outcome of this budget, Najib has already won the next 13th General Election. With his charismatic approaches, and how he outstandingly dealt a lot of local and international issues, I don’t see any reason why he cannot win with high majority. Trust me, Pak Lah’s bad luck is now over!
Max nodded. “Yeah, I wondered how she got that.”
If you don't, you might miss things like this:
Each life unravels differently
O gods! How beloved he is,
"...Ship Arriving Too Late..." and "...Dangerous Kitchen" were performed as improvisations, with Frank scatting the lyrics from a 3-ring binder. He had not yet written the music that would complete the songs. Early in the recording, you will hear an issue with Security when there was a ticket mix-up. It's a wonder that no one saw the recorder during all that.
The “Doni Tondo” is located in Florence (in the Uffizi) in its original tondo or round frame. This painting was commissioned by Agnolo Doni to commemorate his marriage to Maddalena Strozzi, the daughter of a powerful Tuscan family.
Who knoweth the power of thine anger?
thank you for your listening. and reading.
It's about ten feet deep, the old step irons have broken off further down. Not allowed to use them, these days, anybody going down there need to be lowered by winch, wearing a recovery harness and gas detector. It looks harmless enough, but methane gas, carbon dioxide and carbon monoxide can pool in the bottom of holes like this. The person who goes down becomes unconscious quite rapidly, and then a rescuer goes down, and the same thing happens.
Soooo...I'll keep working on it; apologies for any difficulty on your end.
However, now removed from the motorcade is a customized ambulance with a life support system that was specifically designed for her when she was Chief Minister.
“Economic globalization has become a war against nature and the poor” says Dr. Vandana Shiva.
- The most daring thing she every did was ride a roller coaster, and once she did she was hooked. She said she "never wanted to get off".
Immediately upon entering the village, you can feel the warmth emanating from beneath your feet, and bending down to touch the ground, a few seconds is long enough, before your fingers start to feel the wrong side of warm.
“Hurry up! You’re killing me, Smalls,” he shouts. He lets out a scoff and the kid takes my hand and now I’m running with him, but I feel like I’m doing more anchoring than moving. I’m not even trying anymore, my feet dragging. I close my eyes to see if I can try to sleep while he does all the running for me.
Whenever I see something pirate-themed, it easily gets my attention. You can guess that by the photograph above. That was taken last May when we were at Walt Disney World with my in-laws. My MIL really wanted to do the Pirates and Pals Fireworks Voyage. It was a lot of fun. We started off at a reception area where they made us put on these silly bandanas. Then we literally pillaged the food area that was filled with massive amounts of loot, including treasure chests bursting with chocolate gold coins. After we stuffed our booties -- I mean, our faces, which probably went right to our booties -- we got our picture taken Captain Hook and Mr. Smead ...
We had an uneventful, relaxing hike out from Bee Island. We spent many hours out on the prairie hiking back to the trailhead, but we were blessed with good temperatures early in the day and we had crossed to the covered oak hammock before it got too warm and the sun got too high in the sky. We saw more wildlife and birds in the hammock and even came across puddles of water! There were some beautiful flowers; even an early Iris was blooming. We arrived back at our vehicles, tired but pleased with our adventure. Of course there was the celebratory ice cream or adult beverage we had to claim as our prize, they chose the adult beverage! We calculated our mileage, speed of travel and calories burned over the last three days and we were quite happy to say that we burned appx. 3200 calories more than we took in each day! If you want to burn more stored fat than instant calories, this is the way to do it!
Boston has a surprising number of parks, and many have historical significance. We like the Boston Public Garden because it is just so pretty (whereas Boston Common is supposedly less flowery). Apparently critics say this park is garish. As someone who hates gardening, I need to get my fill of flowers somewhere and this park did the trick. Sadly, I didn't take many photos of the flowery goodness because I was too focused on this hilarious couple obsessed with feeding the squirrels:
Thank you, thank you very much. Be sure to tune in next week when the answers will be posted!
"To me, selling women's clothes using a teenage boy's body is the ultimate cynicism. It's as if the fashion industry is saying, 'Here is the perfect woman for our clothes: a boy!' " says style guru and "Project Runway" mentor Tim Gunn in his forthcoming book "Tim Gunn's Fashion Bible: The Fascinating History of Everything in Your Closet." (He is talking about Andrej Pejic, pictured above.)
I’d feel as if I were home.
lunar cavities
In 2008, Simply Oklahoma opened its doors and now several thousand works of art by over 150 artists are on display for all to see. From pottery to mosaics, oils and acrylics to watercolors, natural stone jewelry to hand-carved items filled the space upstairs and down; so much so that soon the Robisons determined the downstairs should be a taste of the fine art collections upstairs as well as home for the broad collection of handcrafted merchandise; thus began The General Store while the upstairs became known as The Gallery.
Preheat oven for 375 .
There are exception, of course, including an outlet of the old Brooklyn Fire Department. One sight I always look forward to is the bygone grandeur of the Twenty-Sixth Ward Bank Building. A stately, salmon-colored-stone building, it gracefully curves around a southwest corner on the far end of Atlantic. (See my lousy, taken-from-a-taxi photo above.) It's obviously been out of commission for some years, though something appears to be happening to it; in the last year, the top two stories of the bank were replaced by some new construction. Condo? Thankfully, the handsome base of the building remains.
Last week I wrote a post about how hard it was for southern farmers to find Americans willing and able to do field work. Here are excerpts from a similar story, but this time it comes from the far north (Minnesota), and involves skilled work, not field work.
There was another group that simply read the text four times. Although these people remembered more than the people who read the text only once, the recall of the group doing the retrieval practice test was 64% better than the group that just read the text four times. So replacing 2 rereads with 2 tests substantially boosted people’s week-later performance. It is reasonable to think that the retrieval practice group in step 3 was aware of any information they had missed during their recall efforts in step 2. The reread only group remained ignorant of these gaps in their knowledge.
but from a number of sources
Irishman 1: Well, obviously you should stay here with us and have coffee.
Mix just until blended. Divide dough in half. Roll out each half to a square, 12x12 inches. Cut each square into twelve 3x4 inch rectangles. Place 12 (3x4" rectangles) on ungreased cookie sheets.
I was able to order everyone's except 3 people who did not contact me. :0( (I will continue to try to get in contact with them)
House Majority Leader John Boehner (R-Ohio) chastised Catholic bishops at a Wednesday news conference on Capitol Hill, saying they needed to look at the bigger picture after they complained that the GOP budget plan fails to meet “moral criteria.”
I first saw Zach Galifianakis on Conan one night and the sheer oddity was enough to interest me. He was also hilarious, so that helped. Later, I fortuitously saw him at Bumbershoot in Seattle and his set was so frickin' amazing that I went back again for his next one. I must admit that because of this I was prepared for the audience participation bit and in a rather Martin Prince-ish fashion willed him to call on me. So I sat in a chair on stage (because Zach gets lonely) and laughed. Zach called up a young girl as well who, by all appearances, not only got his jokes, but loved them; just howled. On stage though, she sat totally silent and looked bored. Zach would do a joke, then turn around and look at her, nothing. It was priceless, couldn't have been planned better. Afterwards, Zach took the time to chat with me and we marvelled at the difference between her off-stage and on. His Comedy Central special is also great and I dearly wish I had tapes of his short-lived VH1 talk show Late World with Zach. I watched Bubble Boy and can confirm that Zach's two minutes of screentime are the best two minutes of the entire movie.
I had a long talk with myself and we determined my mitten making dreams were actually tipping all the way over from ambitious to fully delusional.
Be safe, enjoy yourselves and don't drink and drive!!
So how high was I? About 365 metres, or 1200 feet! And, how high is the Sky Tower, a mere 328 metres – 1076.1 ft. No wonder I stopped taking photos – I needed to hang on, grasp the reins and worry.
and know that
Thank you dear. That was quite the testimony. And no problem! It’s the least I can do for you. You deserve it!
Setev had come to Kuala Lumpur earlier this month to hurry the Malaysian government to hear the appeal of two former cops sentenced to hang for Altantuya’s death.
I began thinking about church people. There are some who huff, puff and plan but without much effect. You are conscious of having been in an event but not of receiving life. Then there are those who appear to be doing nothing and life and peace just flow from them.
The meaning of the broad Karoo,
“Get out of the Middle East!”
4) Once you've made a bunch of the coiled shapes, start playing around, arranging them until you find a design you like. Glue together using the school glue. Don't use too much, though, or it will drip down and glue your snowflake to your work surface! You really don't need much to create a strong bond. I usually start with six of the same shape glued in a circle as the center of the snowflake, then start building outward. I suppose you could use a hot glue gun on snowflakes this scale. It's not something you'd use on typical quilling projects (there would be more hot glue than paper on those tiny snowflakes!) and I didn't think of the possibility until just now! But I think it would definitely work, and could really speed up the process if you're making quite a few of these large pieces.
Size & Grade of Diamonds
Much to my dismay we found it wasn't treasure buried under the dirt, just a concrete slab, preventing us from planting flowers in ground here. I suppose the only upside to that is that the planting possibilites are endless now that i can actually dig there.
Foreword
(what a depressing day...supposed to be sunny, it isn't. supposed to be warm, it isn't. i still can't find what i'm looking for - yes, i know, now all ya'll will have that song thumping in your brain pan all day - sorry about that BUT...where are the notes??????)
Add everything to the vita-mix and puree until smooth.
At about 2.30 Anwar made a speech, less than 5 mins, to much cheering, standing on some raised platform. Could see him but could not hear.
After Fred's tie got ruined by Barney while trying to escape the Green Goose's tower, the tie reappears moments later after Fred and Barney got out from the door of the tower.
the gorilla glass is missing in ACE 2.ITS having PLS TFT capacitive touchscreen,16M colors
After more than a year of peddling my book in a traditional publishing market. I was starting to lose hope it would ever see the light of day on a bookshelf. The only response I received was from a shady outfit that would publish my work for a consulting fee and if it sold the minimum required copies, my "fee" would be refunded.
Artificial Intelligence - Kubrick Vs. Spielberg: Andre of the Horror Digest does more to defend Spielberg's interpretation of Kubrick's vision than anyone else ever has. Ever. And come on...how damn cool is Gigolo Joe!?
He sits down on the stairs and wishes he were dead.
All four are still performing their policing duties and have not been suspended from duty.
I am more inspired than ever in my new “Blue Room.” Honestly, I feel the creative juices flow more naturally inside this room, where all the magic happens. Thankfully, the recent wave of brides who have tried on their wedding dress in the new space are just as thrilled.
3. Place the head into a boiling pot and simmer for around two hours. (Any longer and the hair will fall out!) Once the head is done, the skin will look dark and rubbery and will have shrunken down to about 1/3 its original size. Turn the skin inside-out and use a good, sharp knife to remove any hunks of extra flesh. Once you have it clean, return the skin to its original shape.
How do you know if you’re dehydrated?
The minute that you sing that, oooh, Swanee River
__Among the unique exhibits of the 4th century B.C., made by the ancient craftsman’s there is a gold upholstering of the festive case for a bow and arrows from the burial mound dug out in Melitopol, on the gold relief plate of which there are represented stages from the myth about the ancient Greek hero of Achilles; the silver gilded bowl from the Haymanova Mohyla burial mound (Zaporizhia region) with the pictures of negotiations of Scythian tsars; the gold “helmet” from Perederieva Mohyla burial mound (Donetsk region) with the pictures of Scythian warriors and, certainly, exhibit № 1 is the gold necklace is of the Scythian tsar from the Tovsta Mohyla burial mound (Dnipropetrovsk region). This masterpiece is often called the “find of the century”. Not only the exquisite performance technique, but also a huge emotional and artistic influence on a visitor causes admiration. The whole informational completeness of composition of the necklace is just incomprehensible today. The author of the find and its first researcher B. Mozolevskiy considered that its three levels contain the stages of preparation to the vernal equinox holiday and the mystery of a sacrifice. In the wide sense – it is a chart of transition from the world of Chaos to the world of Space.
Working from home can be hard, especially if you are used to the ‘norms’ of office life. At first the move from an office to your home can be daunting, as you are by yourself, however, it doesn’t always have to be so bad, following the tips below you should be able to keep productive and enjoy the fact that you don’t have to spend time the train/tube/bus/car commute, and ultimately spend more time with the family.
I can't say enough about making lists. They are invaluable to get things done and when things get busy and guests are arriving. They keep you organized and truly aid in you having a good time also. When people ask if they can help, you can glance it over and give them a job. I love it when someone preps for me (especially someone who knows how to chop etc.) and I can focus on cooking. As a guest, I absolutely love being someone's prep cook. A delicious bottle of wine in the kitchen with the cooks is a must!
Suddenly the entire passageway becomes awash with
Interviewer: And you are not prepared to sit down with them either?
Sarah Palin is no more qualified to be a president than I am. And I'm not qualified in any way, shape, or form. But I do know there are several things I don't want in a president, as follows:
Though I sometimes try to organize my collection, several of the books have apparently become migratory over the years. For the life of me, I can’t explain how Jeffry Eugenides’ Middlesex ended up next to Retired Racing Greyhounds For Dummies. And just the other day, I found my lost copy of The Hunger Games hiding beneath Stiff: The Curious Lives of Human Cadavers.
The trouble is, it's possible to fall so in love with NLP that it shifts from being the new idea to being a mantra. It can, if you're not careful, become the new box. This is why I give a recommendation which some people find strange:
I’m lost in a poem on the 8.30 to London.
Onion - 1 no, medium size
Marian's peak achievement was a three-foot-high Alice in Wonderland sculpture that she had fired in a commercial kiln and donated to the Oxford Elementary School in Cleveland Heights, in the late 1950s. This school houses an excellent collection of Federal Art, much of it produced under the supervision of or using the processes of Edris Eckhardt. Perhaps Marian's Alice is still there today?
By working out at FLEX or doing core strength at home at least three times a week, you’ll not only feel the difference in your strength and flexibility, you’ll have a stronger, more toned physique. So get to work on your core today!
In the beginning God created the heavens and the earth. And the earth was waste and void; and darkness was upon the face of the deep: and the Spirit of God moved upon the face of the waters. (Gen 1:1-2, ASV)
I know this is a little thing, but it's so indicative of one of the major problems with the whole system: a complete lack of options. I'd love to go down the road and try another store, but that's either pointless, or if 'down the road' is across the state line, it's illegal.
Brodsky focused on financial issues, asking why the discount rate—the interest rate used to calculate the expected rate of return for the project—had been changed from 6% to 3% from the predecessor memo prepared in October. (The December memo offers no explanation as to why.)
How cool is that then?! Two dollars got me a pretty celery green welcome sign on a painted tray.
These cards emphasize embossing without cutting, adding layers and frames to side-open and tent cards and more.
Gregory: okay
First we have the new challenge at
I woke up waiting for the siren to go off warning us of a tornado in town.
"You can pull your pants up and get up" "Come here"
Not to worry - in recompense we've come up with the next best thing - firstly, Matt is RIGHT NOW on his way to Pop Gallery at Downtown Disney, to give THEM the larger canvases, etc. to hang in the gallery instead. So - a lot of what was destined for the Art Stroll is now at Downtown Disney instead, so if you were planning to be in the area for the show tonight - instead just hop over to Pop Gallery - it's INDOORS! And secondly - I've decided to run a "Sorry It Rained" eBay print sale - my latest prints I was bringing for the show, all up on eBay at the $9.99 discount "show price" to help make up for it (and hey, this way you internet folks get to take advantage of it too!).
Elastic bands
“What? I… Oh, all right. Be there in thirty minutes. Forget the Reverend. That’s not going to happen.”
I wonder what's up with Preschooler? The school nurse said he had an accident today at school (of the nasty kind). Maybe he's got a bug? But that's nothing unusual for him. . .
And so I'm here, blogging about broomball instead of playing broomball as I wait for the result of the game. The pictures - courtesy of NYCSSC - are from last week's game against Gotham Blades. Yes. Last week. This ain't twitter folks. I'm the one in the highlighter yellow pants.
The Communist Party was not outlawed in Denmark until the Nazi invasion of the Soviet Union in June 1941. At that point, the Germans told the Danish government to intern the leaders of the Danish communists, which they did. In November 1942 about 250 were sent to the Horseroed camp, which was run by the Danish police, not by the Nazi Gestapo (later on it was taken over by the Nazis).
Everybody rolls with their fingers crossed
Stardust Stickles
if you love the April you are going to flip for the May KOM..
1/2 c. milk
I could go on and on, but you get the point. I find it increasingly difficult to take anti-Semites seriously. While I acknowledge that some Jews have had a deleterious influence on Western culture and society (most notably when it comes to feminism), the idea that the whole of Judaism is united to get whitey is just fucking ludicrous. If the race realists, white nationalists, and other related groups want to gain any political traction, they need to read the crazier Jew-haters out of their ranks. Affiliate yourself with dummies and people will think you’re one too.
Sources: Mavis M. Leung, “With What Is Evangelicism To Penetrate The World? A Study Of Carl Henry’s Envisioned Evangelicism,” Trinity Journal 27NS No. 2 (Fall 2006); Carl F. H. Henry, Gods Of This Age or…God Of The Ages, ed. R. Albert Mohler, (Nashville, TN: Broadman and Holman, 1994); Henry, God, Revelation, and Authority, vol 4
“And what does that represent, is it any kind of symbol in that video, could you explain me the meaning?” I started.
“Just kill me!”
In addition to the the blog roll and links on my sidebar, here I list some favorite and recommended links and sources, by subject:
It is the ebb and flow
Today’s lesson…bending and standing strong…at some point you have to do both and possibly at the same time.
This is such a lovely place. While many folks go to the Bristol Art Gallery or the Hope Gallery because they are in the actual center of Hope Street..... believe me....it's well worth taking a walk a little further down the street to see what's there as well.
This is right after we moved in and opened up the small doorway between the kitchen and living room. You can see the living room redo here. Besides just wanting more of an open concept, the only way to have an island would be to open up the doorway.
Dina Halpern The Dybbuk
Thank God I can move right now, so much to do...
Her reply: “Well, I think it’s funny. And I don’t want you to get mad!”
I’m really looking forward to seeing what you come up with! I love flash fiction and know that 42 words will be a (fun) challenge! Please let your friends know about the competition and Good Luck! The winner and runners up will be announced here on the blog at 8.00pm on May 8th at the end of my launch party for Housewife with a Half-Life!
I certainly am Tickled Pink right now.
Dawn maintains two Twitter accounts for its news brands. The Dawn.com account has 9,725 followers with a Klout of 61, while the Dawn News account has 13,164 followers with a Klout of 42.
“That is a wise observation, child,” he said, “and one for which I do not have an answer. It is not our place to judge what we might consider their shortcomings.”
Organ. Guitar. Harp.
I feel like its a special bond/secret language that we have, just between us!
You see, the house we were renting at the time was an older house. It had a narrow hallway that wouldn’t let the stretcher into our bedroom, easily. We were going to have to find another way to move me out of the bedroom.
For today's card I used the rattle cut from the Sampler Cricut cartridge.
5. Content. This post probably doesn’t have the meat in it some of you were hoping for. But I will leave you with a little sneak peak of what I have on deck (with the caveat that it’s all subject to change – you can’t script inspiration):
Although not one of his most famous works, I was drawn to his piece called 'Outre Beijo' (Another Kiss). I loved the relationship between the two subjects and the way Britto shows the man with a heart on his cheek (maybe another way of saying he wears his heart on his sleeve?).
One of the things I’ve realised recently is that I’ve been using the word ‘deontology’ for a long time in a slightly unusual way without really explaining myself (e.g., in the claim ‘deontology is first philosophy’). As such, an explanation of what I mean by talking about deontology and how this differs from the standard use of the word is long overdue. Deontology is ordinarily used to denote a particular kind of approach to ethics, most famously adopted by Kant (though he never used the word, as it was only introduced in the 20th Century). What characterises this approach is that it takes the notions of obligation and permission to be the most basic ethical concepts, and this is why it is called ‘deontology’, because ‘deon’ in greek means that which is binding or obligatory. I don’t endorse Kant’s particular ethics, and although I don’t have anything resembling a complete ethical theory, it would nonetheless be correct to put me somewhere in this deontological tradition, granted that it is defined in this very loose fashion. However, the primary sense in which I use deontology does not pick out this approach to ethics. Instead, what I mean by deontology is not strictly a theory at all, but rather a discipline or area of inquiry analogous to ontology. I find this fairly intuitive, since ‘deonto-logy’ can be understood to mean the science of obligation in much the way that ‘onto-logy’ means the science of Being. But as this isn’t the common usage of the term, it’s important to make this explicit.
The choice to someone down the line
Bridgette Wilson (Mortal Kombat)
464 comments
I can't not pick my dear little estranged kitty. She lives on a different location because I'm allergic (sob) but I get to see her now and then. She remembers me every time, and that always makes me happy.
(3) “Foreign Oil Imports Drop As U.S. Drilling Ramps Up,” Elizabeth Shogren, NPR, January 24, 2012, http://www.npr.org/2012/01/24/145719179/foreign-oil-imports-drop-as-u-s-drilling-ramps-up
Sure it’s just another mundane day with nothing spectacular on the horizon. But that doesn’t mean God won’t pull you in or use you to touch a life in some special way today.
Unfortunately, that’s just not the case. Because if we don’t have an account of the origin of sin we will end up making God the author of evil—a thesis that has been persistently and strenuously rejected by the orthodox Christian tradition. Enns thinks he can save the Gospel by simply affirming universal human sinfulness without taking a stand on the origin of sin; but that is to fail to recognize that what’s at stake is the goodness of God. If God uses evolutionary processes to create the world andsin is inherent in those processes, then creation is synonymous with fall and God is made the author of sin—which compromises the very goodness of God. And if the goodness of God isn’t central to the Gospel, I don’t know what is. I don’t deny that this is an incredibly thorny issue; and this is not necessarily an apologetic for a “blow-by-blow” understanding of the Fall. I only point out that Enns’ account doesn’t recognize it as an issue. And that is a problem. Indeed, I think it explains why so much of the recent debate about the historical Adam has been an adventure in talking past one another—and why we need a new conversation to delve further into these issues, working with what Hays calls an “ecclesiocentric” hermeneutic rooted in the worship practices of the church.
But of course just as they screw up the calendar and everything else they touch, they screw up the name of the series since in their medieval and backward cult, it is illegal to depict all of Allah's attributes - which in fact are zero - so there will only be 98 characters.
“For by one Spirit are we all baptised into one body, whether we be Jews or Gentiles, whether we be bond or free; and have been all made to drink into one Spirit.”
Cast : Joanne Samuel, Lou Brown, Bunny Brooke, John Bluthal, Vincent Ball, Margie McCrae, Julie Wilson, Martin Vaughan, Rosalind Speirs, Robyn Gibbes, Ian Coughlan, Ralph Cotterill, Marion Johns, George Carden, Belinda Giblin
There is a lot of contention about this area
Karl, you never have seen such a glorious sight
All in all, though, I did enjoy the story in Under Her Brass Corset. It has a fun, if somewhat predictable, plot and I really enjoyed Merlin the cat. I’m curious to see what Brenda Williamson does next.
How much does it cost? Nothing!
“Make it on the house” she winked. He was off.
this next clip is just such a good straightforward approach/logic to censorship. but man, so difficult to execute a strong defense of rape jokes in a hostile television environment. very tricky! easy to back off and go back home where it's safe, but he makes it look pretty easy with his acting out of the "establishment" voice. there's also something I want to call a "ghetto christopher hitchens" effect going on here:
For me there were many magic moments in this programme, but of all of them, the one I will pick out was when a former soldier, who had been blinded by a roadside bomb and had also suffered several other injuries, described himself as fortunate, because, in his own words, ‘some of my team came home in a box’. He was busy training for the blind football team – you need to watch the programme to see how that works.
In sad, lamenting grief we’re cloaked
Once the radio equipment was stashed, the three men consulted a map. Manny took a reading with a compass and then the three of them shouldered their packs and weapons and set off toward the northwest.
STICK INSECT
Talking nerdy to you.
If you simply say that the lessons absolutely MUST be there the night of the exchange or the person does not get to participate you will save everyone a whole lot of trouble. Simple as that. It's not cold-hearted, but rather fair and compassionate for the rest of the group who has made the effort to get it done on time (and frankly for the procrastinator who knows it's a firm deadline). In the groups I participated in, where this was expected, there was never, in 3+ years, a person who missed getting their lessons there.
I got to use my new Cricut again for the second time. It was a Christmas present to myself. I love using the Cricut for the lettering of a layout title.
I recently heard a straight guy — a married man, with kids — declare about distiller Lance Winters "I would be that man's wife in a heartbeat." I'm not sure how Winters would feel about that. Or Mrs. Winters, for that matter. But I understand the sentiment. See, we have a deep and abiding respect for St. George Spirits here at the Whiskey Forge. More than once I've considered chucking my entire career, throwing myself at Winters' feet, and saying "Teach me." That hasn't happened yet.
There’s one key area of government, however, where the influence of the FMLN/ARENA duopoly is less cut and dry: the presidency. Since assuming office in mid 2009, Mauricio Funes, a former television journalist who ran under the FMLN banner, has governed more as an independent, demonstrating again and again that he is not beholden to the party that made his election possible.
The circle is now complete. One journey has ended and another has begun.
He wanted her to bring a bag and go home in the truck with him. She’s a mom of five grown kids, all whom she’s very close with. Her unorthodox parenting methods turned out far better kids than most. She’s got kidney surgery looming at the end of the month. So she did not get in the truck other than to pose for pictures and insisted Rachel stay with her, no doubt as a bodyguard.
I am embarrassed to tell you on the wee hours before May 21 I got the stool out and climbed up to the cupboard where the ashes of my parents are kept. I believed the dead in Christ would rise first, then me. I had hoped to catch a glimpse of Mama and Mr. Dad. I fell asleep holding my bible in one arm and the can of ashes in the other arm. Like the rest- the wake up of that day was excruciatingly horrible.
Paragon blinked once or twice after Crockett’s sly remark, & quit talking. For several weeks the snake didn’t say a word. Whenever he was in the Kiva, all he did was read. Which Crockett soon got used to & before long, he no longer hated Paragon. In fact, he was growing kind of fond of his scaly roommate who was always crawling around on his belly here, there and everywhere.
I just wanted to let you know that the reason I left all the comments on the last post unmoderated over the weekend is that we went to see my son compete in the state-level forensics tournament at Susquehanna University. Thomas, a sophomore, made the finals round in Persuasive Speaking, which we arrived in time to watch, and "scored big points with the judges" (a quote from his speech) with his original presentation, "An Abridged Speech." He took first place, which was actually the first competition he'd won this year; good time to shine. He's also qualified for nationals in the Catholic Forensics League, and he's first alternate (third place in PA) for nationals in the National Forensics League. We're very proud of him.
I am restraining myself from flinging the damn thing out of the window.
On my mom’s side, I have
But this law does set a dangerous precident. It claims that any ovum is the same as any person in cases of assult or murder. It is not clear that a pregnant woman's intent to terminate her own pregnancy is not assault or homocide upon her embryo or fetus, moving her from the class of "mother" to the class of "attacker".
Morgen: You’re so welcome, Elizabeth. Do come back and do something else when you have time.
Amen, amen, I say to you, whoever believes in me will do the works that I do, and will do greater ones than these, because I am going to the Father. And whatever you ask in my name, I will do, so that the Father may be glorified in the Son. If you ask anything of me in my name, I will do it.’” John 14:5-14 (RSV)
22. Laughing with Rach and Hann, or their pals, or my pals. I always need my inhaler after a good laughing sesh with certain pals.
The problem, then, is the Doctor. Baker remains magnificent in the part, but the series is, in this model, forced to fight against him continually. Not just in terms of his own preferences on the series, which were much more in line with what he got in the Graham Williams era than what he was getting now, nor in terms of his increasingly difficult behavior, but in the basic nature of his character. The Doctor that Bidmead wants are the Doctors that Whitaker wrote for - the small and seemingly harmless men who skulked and observed and learned to understand the system before making a single decisive move within it. Not the Doctors of the 70s - big, starring leading men who were the center of attention and whose charisma and likability drove the entire story.
Another good one from Dark and White.
I gotta get drunk I just can't stay sober there's a lot of good people in town
"You used to say this stuff before, you know. But only about women."
Last Friday I hosted a large Shabbos dinner for my many lovely students. I made 7 challahs only 6 of which got eaten, so I had some challah on hand. (Which is awesome on many levels)
April 20 JJ Bohemia’s Chattanooga TN
“Syb!” She pushed at her shoulder. “I can’t see the road!”
I began to see that people in the most desperate need could change their situation and succeed in life if they were able to access a few simple resources: emotional and spiritual support, the education they need, and a stable economic foundation. Any one of these could make the difference for many, but what scale of help and health might we initiate if we could build a framework that would foster growth in all of these areas?
Despite Vick starting most of last season and this season for the Eagles, he has yet to have an offseason in Philadelphia, as the starting quarterback going into the season. This year, there was a lockout. Last year, he was second string. The year before, he was third string and only used in wildcat formations. He has come a long way in reviving his career. Whether they make the playoffs or not, I expect Michael Vick to have the best season of his career next year, with a full offseason as the starter, with QB gurus Andy Reid and Marty Morningweg. Not to mention his explosive supporting cast, atop the league in rushing yards and touchdowns LeSean McCoy. He also has the most explosive receiver in DeSean Jackson, who should have a contract by next season, at the very least a franchise tag. Jeremy Maclin and Brent Celek, 2 Pro Bowl caliber players. And that offensive line, has become one of the better lines in all of football, despite having 2 rookies, and 2 guys starting at their positions for the first time in their careers. Jason Peters the left tackle, has been the best in the business and has several Pro Bowls and All-Pro selections for a reason.
Thank you guys for reading and commenting... JUST when I need it most!
If the trends continue then being a self sustaining place will be extremely important in order to not only accommodate the locals but bring about visitors.
Back to our recipe. In this photo, the oils have all been combined and the lye water has been added and I'm beginning to blend them with the stick blender. It's a handy little tool. I hear that in days past Great Great Grandma used to simply stand all day and stir. YIKES. Not for me.
Sweet memories now, yes, only memories
But talking about him as an influence is very, very hard. It requires taking him out of context to see him like that. For me he was—he didn’t dominate my writing; there were so many competing voices. But during the Harper’s years, when I was there and he was still writing for them, when his copy came in, there was a radioactive quality to it. At any given time, there are only a limited number of writers who are operating at that level, who are sustaining that much weight in their prose, and we can argue if we like what they did or not till the end of time, but it’s a Gulliver’s Travels situation—we’re crawling around on a giant.
Prophet Muhammad was an orphan himself and was ordered by Allah to be kind to orphans and the needy.
Hook spars with gulls
Third, I got by on Advil only today. I was too scared to take the REAL painkillers (even though I sort of needed them during the afternoon) because I was afraid I'd fall asleep standing up like a horse.
But seriously, I googled reviews on that online essay company, and I found out that many clients are complaining because they seem to submit outputs that are either poorly written or totally unconnected to the topic. Well yeah, I could really be one of their prized writers. Or I could be the only one. Too bad, I’m too lazy to write. My philosophy is simple: if you want me to write, give me a higher pay. And please don’t offer below minimum wage projects.
who bears a heartbreaking loss such as Jake’s could understandably be forgiven for sullenness and histrionics. The fact that Jake essentially remains himself throughout his adjustment to life without a voice is laudable. He recognizes early on that he can take on of two roads, and thereby relinquishes the temptation of feeling sorry for himself. Even so, one can’t escape such a life-altering event emotionally unscathed, and while Taylor delves a little bit into Jake’s grief and frustration, I would have loved for her to explore Jake’s emotional development more.
3 labouring
I have said before how I like Rob Bell’s idea that we can be a living Eucharist. This idea resonates with my hope and intention that faith in Christ is as much if not more about living a life of compassion and joy then saying the right words, believing the right things, or attending the perfect church. None of us are as we should be and we never will be the good news that attacks us is that God loves in spite of it. God’s love enables us to live the life that we ought to live, but without God, this is not possible. Without God, we are lost at sea; with God, we have purpose and strength to live lives of compassion and joy.
First, my info. I worked in the street of one of America's most violent, dangerous cities for 15 years. I usually worked in the worst part of that city. I spent 15 years in patrol. I liked patrol. It was wild. Most of the time I worked in areas covered in ghetto. By that I mean large housing projects combined with run down slum housing. I have worked all shifts. Later I became an investigator including a robbery investigator. I have spent countless hours in interrogation rooms talking to hold up men. I know them. I am still an investigator but have quit playing the Robbery game because my family was starting to forget what I looked like.
sprinkle with salt and let rest in a colander to release it's juice
Two weeks ago, Amazon announced its brand-new Kindle Owners' Lending Library, which makes it possible for Amazon Prime members to borrow ebooks for free. Members can borrow one ebook a month, which they can keep on their Kindle for as long as they like. Since borrowing is limited to one book at a time, downloading a new title causes the old one to be deleted.
In his earlier books, TV news anchor Tom Brokaw has leaned heavily on the experiences of others to remember and define what he calls “the Greatest Generation”–those who came of age during World War II and its aftermath. In A Long Way Home Brokaw turns inward to focus on his own experiences growing up in South Dakota, his early years a broadcaster working in a then-novel medium, and his still-deep connection to the Midwestern people, places, and values that shaped him. In this bluntly effective and homespun memoir, Brokaw argues that, no matter how far one may travel–say, to New York and through five decades of a successful broadcast journalism career–it’s possible to remain a true creature of the heartlands. It’s a message that is likely to resonate most emphatically with those of Brokaw’s generation, though its basic premise can be applied more universally as well. –David Bombeck
1 flaring
18. Pretentious Assholes - South Of New Haven
My own poem was a 13-line sonnet (I call it the fibonacci sonnet form). The chosen poet wasn't allowed to speak about their own poem until after the feedback. It was an interesting process, and the poets were quick to see the areas in the poem that I was hesitant about myself, which confirmed the accuracy of my hesitation. I wasn't sure how many people realised it was a sonnet form I was using; but since hardly anyone (anyone?) writes in a 13-line sonnet form that wasn't all surprising.
The circumstances seem banal enough to me, but are apparently surreal to lots of other people.
and have to share the goodness with you...
47. Nah mind how pumpkin vine run, he must dry up one day. Every life comes to an end sooner or later.
A Web site used by Al Qaeda in Iraq confirmed al-Zarqawi’s death and urged its followers to continue the insurgent fight.
Regional coupon inserts & value differences are to be expected!
1:56 PM on January 19, 2012
This is an unimaginative and non-thrilling sequel to the 1998 hit The Mask of Zorro, starring Antonio Banderas as the masked hero of the suppressed. This time he fights enemies of the territory of California as it tries to join the union.
In this link of the GI Files, Iran were concerned over Syria and they were in contact with STRATFOR and debating a possibility of a palace coup or other form of coup so that power doesnt go to anyone except a trusted Iranian ally. It doesnt matter how many people are dying. People are debating over the next president and they need to do it fast because they predict that Assad will fall soon enough in 2012 and with the mossad and MI6 involved, its likely they will stage a coup so that power is transferred to an Iranian ally. But it also makes note that the US will not collabrate with Iran and talks further about Iran’s current weakness in the matter and how much they are worried about Turkey and Saudi Arabia helping the Syrian opposition.
What a dish.
His birthday was last week, actually, so this post is a little belated, but my birthday is next week, so I split the difference and I'm calling this post's timing perfecto!
That is security. We have been free born. Consider Romans 3:24. “Being justified freely by his grace, through the redemption that is in Christ Jesus.” Otherwise, as believers, we have been declared righteous without a cause by the grace of our Lord Jesus Christ. According to 2 Corinthians 5:17, by being in Christ we are new creatures.
So I’ve spent more time in Paleohora than I planned, waiting for Samaria to open, but it’s been nice. I would really like to run into more people my age though. The Greeks here either work in the tourist industry or are children, and all the tourists are middle aged Germans and Austrians, a few Brits, a Swedish couple etc. or they are ageing hippies who hung around and married in.
As the hot burning ashes made their way across the atmosphere, they eventually made their way to the skies over the five cities,whereupon the exposed and escaping natural gas condensed around the sulpheric ashes and embers, which then erupted into flames, of thousands of degrees farenheit, which then rained down mercilessly on Bad edh Dhra and Numeira.
But, don't worry about me. Waffle House is just two blocks from the office (assuming I can walk there without breaking my neck), and I'll be sleeping on my couch tonight. It won't be as comfortable, but it will be much quieter than that hotel.
I picked up the first couple of Erash Fandorin novels out of curiosity. The first had been short-listed for a Silver Daggar Award by the Crime Writers' Association and I spotted the first two in a charity shop a couple of years ago. I only read them recently and have sought out the others, although I'm still a few missing. There have been thirteen Fandorin novels, two of them novella-length and published in the UK in a single volume (Special Assignments). At least eleven of the stories have been translated (although in ten volumes).
At our retreat to plan the Create in Me retreat, we tried the art exercise/meditation that our leader had planned to have us do the first night of the Create in Me retreat. I wrote this post about the process. To sum up, we arrived to our tables after breakfast to find 3 markers at our seats; everyone had different colors. Our leader brought in a blank calendar page, October, for each of us. We were told to fill in our calendars however we'd like. We could use the markers of our neighbors, but we couldn't talk. We would have 10 minutes. For the more recent Create in Me retreat, we had the materials under our seats.
Would my career of choice have been different?
Opinion: “Museums need more compelling games”
three pieces are size 16, but work with all the different
And if you’re like me, you’ll want to snap some photos of your own and, National Parks also offers tips and tricks from National Geographic staff photographers to help make that motorcycle adventure a picture-perfect experience.
That happened last week when we were out on
Almost forgot ... the refernce in the title to this piece is for the magnificent goat curry which worked so well with Bon Chiens and the pie which paired up a treat with the Red Tail. Mmmmm!
IP: Not a fan of these shops, but need to be careful how we do it – the shops exist because of the free market.
I found it surprising that the author Parker, writes in short dialogue with modern words. Threw me off there for a bit but was accepted quickly. I'm thinking that's so good about it.
I'm far from impervious. I have the same self-confidence issues everyone else has. But I've learned to take everything I hear with a grain of salt and a shot of tequila. (Your brand of devil-juice may vary.)
Another section of Chidziva’s family-Chiziva, Guzha, Mhembere, Gotora, Chirimuta, Masango, went to live in the Mrewa district.
These two fashionistas use their twin powers for good, to bring inspiration to those in search of the latest fashion, those looking to spice up their wardrobe or even those who need a little fashion coaching. They created a fashion blog featuring looks they style themselves posting inspiring ensembles of how to style what you have (and where to get it). We’ve all been invited to those events where you just can’t piece together the right outfit for the occasion, so Itty Bitty asked these two lovely ladies to help our readers out with some looks. This will be the first in a series of styled looks that will span out over the entire wedding season & into the Fall with an office party look!
If you follow the workouts strictly, you’ll be going at it 6 days a week. My wife and I did over 90% of the workouts as scheduled, which required quite a lot of planning, discipline, and coordination. The workouts alternate between resistance and cardio for three weeks, followed by a slightly less intense 4th week. Then, the two upper body workouts are swapped for two different upper body workouts for a month; the final month alternates the two programs.
source: author for review
Hang in there!
Lego
-fence the front yard (something short, and cute to keep the dog penned in)
Another point raised during the discussion concerned the fact that there will be friction and risks of fragmentation because of potential conflicts between the regulation and the directive. One should relate the DP discussion within a wider context of free trade and competitive markets, the evolving technology developments ( example of profiling) and the risks this brings and the need to protect consumers, civil liberties, etc. Data protection is an old notion. It should not be seen as a technical measure but an invitation to companies to gain consumer thrust by respecting the consumer in his rights, and a means of further innovation. Need for global approach, allies like the USA, consumer protection rules & competition rules; data protection has economic consequences.
Yes, it's the burlap-covered Christmas "Sweet Treats" table revamped for Valentines Day. I moved the chalkboard in this room, but have not yet written anything on it. I spent $3 at Dollar Tree last weekend and bought the big hearts, the assorted scattered hearts on the table and some matching boxes to fill with a gift for each person at the dinner party to take home.
One day cooking lager enthusiasm will go full circle. The supermarkets will be prevented from selling me cheap grog, and cooking lager enthusiasm will return to its roots at the Hypermarkets of Calais. Until then I raise my glass in toast to our French cousins and their fine lout in thanks and appreciation.
We look forward to all devotees participating and sharing their realizations so atht others can benefit. the topic is “what is the Standard of Krsnas Character”
When I was a kid, and when know that money was IMPORTANT. In my case, my mother was a single mother and she was almost blind, so we didn’t have a lot of money. Honestly we where very poor, but my mother tried to make the best out of it so I never had the feeling of being poor. But we where, even if she “manipulated” me to not to feel poor.
The Czech is well aware of the dangers that relegation-embattled teams pose; QPR proved an insurmountable obstacle recently and historically, struggling sides have made Arsenal work hard in previous seasons. There is a confidence about the squad at the moment which suggests they are more than capable of making these tasks less arduous than it might previously have been.
So, all you non-sexual predators, here’s a step-by-step guide to getting things going with your platonic crush:
I know I have a million emails to reply to (as always) and I will be catching up on them today and tomorrow, hooray. I've read some fab books while I've been off, including Anna and the French Kiss (yes, it is as awesome as everybody says) and The Seeing (ADORE). I'm almost done with Popular by the lovely Gareth Russell as well, which I'm absolutely in love with.
Ice seeped through the centre of his face, and for a moment the flickering shadow in a crack in the stonework was a maw, spreading black toothless jaws to engulf the nearest stone. Greater clarity, and the thing outside the walls resolved just a little; a cloud of needles, glossy and black, the firelight spraying tiny glimmers across their million facets. Every needle pointed straight at him, straight at his face, but each bore a shadow trained on Taslin.
"A bit in school," the farthest man answers. "Not for a while."
Knitting with Malabrigo Lace, however, more than makes up for my inadequacies. They don’t call this yarn Mmmmmalabrigo for nothing! I have a specific plan for the FO – it’s to go with this dress I got last year:
To repeat – I would vote against making my belief enforcable by law, because it’s unreasonable for the beliefs of any one person (or a group of people) to be forced on others by law.
election in Honduras …was clean and fair."
Discard the bay leaves and transfer the mixture to a food processor or blender. Blend until smooth and return to the saucepan.
After so many years of playing though, Nick began to resent the sport he once cared so much about.
Another part of the article I object to is the idea that kids make marriages worse. In essence, it says that kids place quite a strain on a marriage, although it only discusses one type of family--one where both the mother and father work outside of the home, and wait until their mid thirties to have their first kid (and possibly last kid). I have only had a kid for a few months, but it is a bit of a shock in the personal freedom department, and I am still learning how to balance my needs and wants with Luthien's. It's been hard figuring out how to be married and how to raise a baby at the same time. I don't see the logic in the article on this point though. Facing and overcoming challenges in a marriage should serve to strengthen it, not weaken it. But this article seems to say that once a couple has children their relationship is only about the kids. I have seen this first hand, but I have also seen marriages that are still awesome and fully functioning with several children. I think couples have to be careful not to let their marriage slide after having kids, rather they need to use the challenges to strengthen and grow their marriage. It reminds me how important it is to make my marriage a priority. I think that because Andy and I will have dealt with this balance between marriage and children from the beginning we will be able to learn the necessary skills to keep both healthy. This isn't to say that couples who have children later can't do this, just that for us it is good to do it early on.
Again, it takes less than 15 minutes for a response:
The simple answer? Time. I only have so much time to offer to a new client and I simply have to love love love it to make the time investment.
Why do I get ousted all over the fucking place!!!!!!!
I bet if was yourself perception
OMW! I miss blogging...
COMMENT.
I have to say, the episode was a nice balance of action and plot. Tune in Tuesday (tonight) for part 2, which airs during NCIS: LA’s regular time slot.
All of it.....all the five hectares registered and the three not and the house. He's even leaving the cane crushing machine.
Love to quilt? Love to laugh? This handy app brings all the best quilting-related humor from print and the web together to keep you in stitches!
Debuts That Deliver (Book Magazine);
Don't forget to visit today's DT and leave a comment on their blog posts to be entered into the draw to win a new release stamp, then pop back to the Whimsy Stamps blog tomorrow for the next list of showcase posts!
14. Another Brick In The Wall – part 2 (5:47)
but they certainly took it to new places, encouraging other aspiring bands
Next stop: barbeque. Wonder if there's places where they'll let me have a beer. Yeek.
OU: After concluding their Winter tour of the UK with shows in Bristol and at the Marquee in London, Pink Floyd took a four month break before bringing their new songs to North America for the first time. They played thirteen shows in April starting with a gig in the Pacific National Exhibition Park in Vancouver, British Columbia.
Few can understand why authorities would sell out the interests of its citizens as a whole by bringing in non-Malaysians to vote. This is especially hard to understand when so many Malaysians abroad are clamouring to vote, but were denied this by both the EC and Malaysian courts.
Weight: 2 lbs.
As has been publicised recently, almost all of the speeding fines issued by JMPD are illegal. Why? Well once they’ve taken an insanely cool picture of you speeding, they are meant to send the fine via registered mail to you. Registered mail means you get a slip in the postbox, you go into the post office and sign for your fine. This is to stop people weaseling out of fines by claiming they never got them. What JMPD do instead is send you a fine in your postbox. This immediately makes the fine illegal. So all that time and effort spent policing people who drive like ass hats and they send them illegal fines.
‘The eminent historian, too—
but it is always there.
S - Safety Pin & Seam Binding
I am an enthusiastic supporter of the "give your characters flaws to make them realistic" school of thought. I have no problem with making Morgan bitchy because, if you read the whole book, you understand why she's like that. But -- if you only read the first chapter, where she dumps her boyfriend and makes a small scene in an expensive restaurant, then goes to work and makes a bigger scene out of being fired, would you put the book down before she drove home? Or would you think she's an unnecessarily angry drama llama?
Rel could feel his cheeks heating. Why couldn't she let it drop? Of all the things he'd had to put up with from Dora, this was the last he could have expected. Digging his fingernails into his palms only served to feed his anger, and he felt his lips twisting in a grimace. Fighting to keep his voice calm, and quiet, he said, "It's not true. You know it, and I deserve better than to have to put up with this from you."
I’ve gone over the plan with Krog and the others, and I think we’ve gotten the final details sorted out. We’re going to let the Grimtotem think that the phylactery is hidden on Alcaz Island, off the Dustwallow coast. First off, it’s a remote spot without much reason for anyone to go to otherwise. Just as important, Drazz’Zilb tells me the island is covered with runes and conjuring circles from the naga mystics there, and so that should make it pretty easy to sell the idea that the phylactery is under some kind of magic lock and key, with Skarr being the only one able to get to it. This way Magatha will figure her best bet it to hit the island when we take Skarr there, rather than trying to get there before us and waste her time trying to track down a phylactery hidden who-knows-where that she can only unlock access to who-knows-how.
The moral of the story is fix what doesn't work before moving on to any new imprint. This latest move by Raider just looks cynical and an attempt to start all over again with a clean slate.
But old enough to know
…is probably effecting him. .the kid… and the cause of everything.. says I should not yell I HATE HIM in front of the kids.. but ya know.. treating me like a fucking Hooker and Whore in front of them is so ok..denying me money for bills and food and clothes for the kids is OK.. drinking till you pass out in front of the kids is OK.. but me.. saying I HATE YOU.. is not ok.. and is fucking the kids up..
At present since 2010 Houston-based Fast Cut Films, in association with Sunset Productions, is working on a documentary feature film, “Where Lightnin’ Strikes” but I have yet to hear of it having been completed.
20 tops
as the sun strokes them with his old, buttery fingers
His tradition of excellence, along with a genuine commitment to customer satisfaction and service, defines and fuels Root’s strong brand loyalty today. Root Candles devotion to purity, honesty and quality is renowned. Each Root candle is carefully handcrafted using processes mastered through five generations of craftsmanship combined with the latest in manufacturing technologies. The results are pure and simple: Root Candles are highly regarded for complex bouquets of subtle fragrances and sophisticated color palettes, important factors for discerning candle lovers. Made in America since 1869.
26. Missing? Toronto
17. I Want My Baby On Mars
What if we flipped through it several times a day?
Please to enjoy ...
Conversely, the collection opens with an essay titled “Upon This Rock,” in which Johnson ingratiates himself into a comradery of musicians participating in a Christian rock music festival. Truth be told, I find Christian rock music 100% percent unpalatable.
or perhaps I didn't hear.
Yet, they are teaching it in the Brazilian preschools (not just my daughter’s, but also other preschools, I’ve learned). I get it. It has a happy, catchy, melody, but that is, essentially, the joke.
Had Torin the whole time with me. Inside, I kept him in the bag, but in the car, he was on my lap the whole time.
I was born into a family with one other child---and that's the way it stayed.
that are too tight and too short! Every time you bend down you have to pull your pants up and these
Color/Finish:Stainless Steel, Faucet Centers*:Requires One Hole Culinaire Pullout Kitchen Faucet
~When uploading to online galleries, please use keyword SNSDC45.
Inside 1 zipped pocket & 2 multipurpose pockets, Leather coach hang tag, Interior fabric lining,
Well, that's when we noticed that we only had one tail-fin.
you feel it now
The boys loved running up to each house, ringing the bell and saying, "Merry Christmas...we're glad you're our neighbors!" They thought it was much more fun than trick-or-treating!!! I think we'll make this an annual tradition.
In my homeschooling Ben, I've learned a few things.
I often see timelines for historical events portrayed as a straight line, like this:
Released in 1965- Vee Jay Records, Cadet, Re-Released 1968 Chess
I then moved over to my sewing machine and added some bubbles and texture lines. I started adding some french knots and tiny beads the other night, then realised I'd struggle to sew it onto the background with them there so stopped!
On Monday, December 21, 2009 thru Wednesday, December 23, 2009 the production “BRIDGE PROJECT” is scheduled to load-in at 212 Ashland Place between Dekalb Avenue & Fulton Street
Happy Cinco de Mayo everyone! Pretty slow news for college football since the announcement of a four-team playoff last week. In local sports, the week has had its ups and downs. Unfortunately, the NFL has had a week of mostly downs.
Student: I feel Mu is everything and nothing. I feel it is like a reflection of the moon on a lake, with no moon and no lake, only reflection
Thank God.
and the movie for a fact was a blockbuster.
Then came Operation Cast Lead. Again, not against a state – the PA is in charge, but it’s not a state – but against a semi-military organization, getting support from the same places, from Iran and from Syria, and it is the de facto government. Which was not the case in the two previous cases.
“Your sons? Like you are my son?”
I made three holes on both covers. I stamped them using Black, Purple and Copper StazOn and the plate by Hobby Art Clear Stamps: Decorative Backgrounds.
Your intentions do destruct most diligently.
I'm not exactly sure what the long term solution is. I'm still nursing and my first priority is to provide excellent nutrition to baby girl. I need to do more research into GAPS and other diets focused on eliminating candida that will not be too harsh for nursing mothers. I have read of issues with yeast die-off and the potential for toxins released into the mother's milk with some diets.
Nevertheless, there is so much more to talk about, much of it good, even in dark times.
Yours truly.
Blowing your nose and spitting profusely ( oh come now, I’m not the only one)
I’ve confronted my tweezer-thief on many occasions, and I get varying answers, most that are vague and uninteresting. Some answers have been disturbing, and through it all, I’ve managed to lose about two dozen pairs over the years.
People in Dallas can check them out tomorrow on Lucky Friday The Thirteenth.
Why do people get up so late – 8:30AM? We barely started rolling at 11AM. What is this – a pleasure trip? It was a short hike. Basically go a bit further up towards the peaks and find a good place for a base camp. The camp selected was on a bit of a plateau with good views of the Arrigetch valley (whenever it was actually visible). It had remains of some animal and tons of goat or sheep droppings. It would be nice to see them. However, I doubt we would see anyone with all that noise a large group makes. Actually there was a third group that went ahead of us. But they were climbers so by that time they have probably crossed the pass already.
Teachers are being forced to report children as young as three to the authorities for using alleged ‘racist’ language, it was claimed last night. Munira Mirza, a senior advisor to London Mayor Boris Johnson, said schools were being made to spy on nursery age youngsters by the Race Relations Act 2000.
P — Barack Obama has to go because:
What does a Millipede Engine run on?!
Getting away from it all by starting a country is an interesting idea but it appears there are no spare uninhabited islands that don't already belong to some larger country that frowns on claim jumpers. Remember the entire British Navy setting sail for the Falklands? Since it's difficult, bordering on impossible, to find places that don't fall under some national jurisdiction there are those who have become enthusiastic about turning abandoned oil rigs into their own separate countries.
Richard Prince
I’m actually pro-death penalty. For a number of reasons. I believe in an afterlife, so I don’t really think you’re robbing anyone of their existence, just their life on this plain. Which, considering the things you have to do get the death penalty, doesn’t sound like that unreasonable a thing to do.
"If they don't do chores, you will have to do them. Aren't you teaching your children to be irresponsible? Aren't you being a slave?"
But, man, watch "Deanie" let it all hang out! No restraint there. If Martin's influenced by anyone in that clip, it's not Crosby but the man performing alongside him. And the always energetic Armstrong seems even more energized alongside Martin. A musical chain reaction is what we're looking at here. But you're not supposed to look at music, are you? So close your eyes and listen. Dino and Satchmo could be brothers.
I hope you're excited to win these fabulous items! Thank you Chelsea for your generosity! Good luck to all my lovely readers...I know you'll enjoy them as much as I do.
The child’s father was called to
“Tim’s a trip, ain’t he,” I said, shaking my head. “Should change his name from Tim to Tom.”ADDED: I get the feeling that the hostility expressed toward "Tim" was displaced hostility toward himself. It's very sad if he resisted loving Genevieve because she was white. Don't you think Genevieve resembles Obama's mother, who was white? Imagine being a heterosexual man and feeling that you weren't supposed to be attracted to a woman who reminds you of your mother. There's this alternate never-to-be-written Obama search-for-identity book titled "Dreams From My Mother."
Half my life
Despite my holier than thou attitude, I later heard (and fell in love with) the Love Junk album, and duly bought the follow up One Sided Story, which I felt was a huge step forward for the band: better songwriting, more diverse.
More of that ‘new tone’ we were promised by Democrats in the aftermath of the Giffords shooting in January (an obvious strong language warning): Bristol Palin verbally attacked by heckler ‘YOUR MOTHER’S A WHORE’
Ultimate Comics the Ultimates #9
na, don't worry about rabies, even
837 ***D-IX/4(A)/1982. “Some Questions About ‘Existentialism’.” Claremont Institute for the Study of Statesmanship Panel, Annual Convention, American Political Science Association, Denver Hilton Hotel, Denver, Colorado. (Incorporated in Item B-5 above, pp. 139-43 (1992).)
“We think this question has everything to do with Krishna. The Supreme Godhead only appears in this world to uplift and benefit humanity, so his very recent appearance as Krishna must be the key to humanity’s welfare in this difficult age.”
Of course at this point, one might think we had a plan. One of the guys asked just that as the branch fell and we were showered with bees. I shouted to my boys to close the car door. Twice. (They seem to take after their dad in the fear department.) Our manly helper men ran around flailing and shooing bees off themselves. My husband sat in the tree, bees swirling all around him while I held onto the ladder with all my might because he had gotten so far out on that skinny branch it looked like it was about to snap. Bees rained down on me like angry black and yellow hailstones.
The Hunger Games (Trilogy) and Divergent
Make Jelly Roll Cake: Preheat oven to 350°F / 180°C.
*And asking could I give full details of what I do, and how much I charge. (The answer is in the Author Visit section of my website.)
The two academies’ members will meet in June in Ohrid to address the open issues between Macedonians and Albanians.
5.In a large bowl, mix beaten eggs, milk, salt and dry mustard. Blend well.
Will help save the planet Earth from total oil slick,
Anyway, Newton elaborates:
Year Of Release: 2012
Let's just say Adam has been just a *tiny* bit busy! In fact, to the point where he is working like a nut all week and then putting the hours at night doing office work until 10:30/11pm in the evening after the boys go to bed. It's all stuff that needs to be done to run his business effectively and hopefully someday soon he can hire someone to do his books. The growing pains are a struggle to say the least for both Adam and myself. It's all good problems to have though! His plumbing business will be nearing a full year of operation by the start of next month and I couldn't be more proud of him. (update...officially he is at a year now in business!)
This is my poolroom (for those of you who have seen the Castle). It is the display case where all my favourite words and awards go. If you want to see what others think of me, here is the place to look. If you aren't interested in naval gazing then I suggest you go home (to my homepage I mean).
It's not that big a deal because Brooklyn is 13, but I did feel better knowing Posh had her moments of weakness albeit not as a food fiend like moi - no doubt she would be able to withstand truffling down a raspberry pavlova if it were shoved under her nose, but still.
We deployed 5 inches from the edges, and 7 inches for the advance deployment Widowmakers (both her unit and my solo). I had first turn and with eSorscha gave the Marksman a spell that basically turns his shot into a 3′ AOE if he killed something. Shot at a Widowmaker without cover and incredibly missed. Bummer. Torch advanced and threw smoke bombs, and Destroyer shot and hit the enemy Destroyer, doing nothing, but killing a Widowmaker in the blast.
I found a lovely tutorial at Clarity Stamps for making a fabulous backgrounds, it's well worth a visit. I didn't have a double sided adhesive so I simplified it a bit.
Well, there are a lot of men’s ministries today doing a baptized version of that. It’s sexy. It’s edgy. It’s probably fun. I mean, after all, most men love Braveheart, Band of Brothers, Lord of the Rings, and Narnia. I know I really love that stuff!
The Snickers Nutella Cupcakes seem to be a favorite order, I guess it’s new anyways. The recipe that I followed from one of the websites seem to add too much sugar! Why do they always do that?! I am so glad that I managed to create my own Nutella frosting (sssshhh…trade secret lor so cannot tell, soweee) hahaha…ok if you’re nice to me I will share the recipe one of these days k.
two 4.5oz mahi mahi fillets (the original recipe was for 6oz fillets of salmon… which I don’t I could eat all in one sitting)
You might be interested to learn that 30 seconds research show that the proportions in other countries are:- France 20%, Germany 26%, Spain 35%, Italy 37%, Sweden 28%, Norway 32%, Austrailia 20%. So, perhaps the UK at 12% is not doing so bad after all!! The full picture usually gives a better perspective, but, hey ho, this is the DM.
Not taking for granted my host family and their love.
The gift of comfort is one that stays with you.
in the way of free expression.
The directorate suggested that Selebi be prosecuted for his actions, and further recommended that Safety and Security Minister Steve Tshwete draw the attention of the Cabinet to the matter, highlighting its powers under sections 8 and 9 of the Police Act.
What, I ask you, is the point of paying a tutor to help you improve your writing when you don't present your real work for her to critique?
- All undergraduates enrolled at the University of Washington are eligible.
The attacks haven't drawn media attention because they are in violation of a crucial liberal myth, the one holding that liberals are the leading contemporary apostles of nonviolence and peace, holding the line of rational behavior against the assaults by all manner of rabid elements, almost all of them right of center. We've heard that one to the point of exhaustion. It's an unspoken axiom of American politics. Liberals inhabit the Isles of the Blessed, where the lion lies down with the lamb and Willie Horton is only a ballplayer, wearing white togas and discussing conflict resolution in low, melodic voices. And the rest of us? We're somewhere off in the depths of Mordor, on a perpetual rampage, following the demagogue of the moment. These days, that would be Glenn Beck waving a musket and Sarah Palin lugging whatever it is you use to shoot wolves from the air. That's the great divide in American politics, from the liberal point of view, one as sharply defined as the gap between the Eloi and the Morlocks, and as permanent. All they need to do is point to Joe McCarthy (who started out as a New Deal Democrat), Lyndon LaRouche (who helped found the Students for a Democratic Society), and Timothy McVeigh. (A rabid atheist. McVeigh refused to see clergy before his execution and demanded that the old atheist chestnut "Invictus" be recited at his funeral. He actually thought he was going to get one of those.)
But wait! (LOL, I love using that line.) The awesome math helps don't end with the Master Ruler. The geniuses at Master Innovations also offer the Master Clock for learning to tell time, Master Fractions (YAY for us... I plan on purchasing this for my little fraction-struggling student), and Master Angles (which I also plan on purchasing next year when our oldest starts geometry). Each of these manipulatives also have coordinating workbooks you may wish to purchase as well. A Marvels of Measures poster is available and several new learning products will be available soon. I can't wait to see what they come out with next!
Having only previously seen a couple of episodes, I decided it was about time I caught up with Red Dwarf (especially seeing as it’s returning to TV later this year). The British sci-fi sitcom originally ran for eight series between 1988 and 1999, before returning for a three-part special in 2009.
That's probably a good thing since I'll be sipping wine while I paint!
Here in Egypt they have styles I’ve never seen;
Check that my son is still breathing
Kate: Tell us about the very first idea you had regarding this story, the one
“Isis and who?”
His journey started from Long Island, New York and followed the outer boundary of America from Maine to the Pacific Northwest, down to California, across to Texas and then back to New York. His idea was to see his country with his own eyes about which he had written so much and he wanted to do it alone but still took Charley along with him for some company. He has written about the places he visited and people he met during this time. He was trying to understand the people of his country but in the end he felt that they did not live upto his expectations. The book ends in an irony where after travelling for the length and breadth of country he gets lost in traffic of New York at his return.
Next time I'll have a good beer review for you all who have been waiting so patiently for it, and trust me it will be more than well worth the wait. In the mean time, I'm going to experiment more with wine cork art (unfortunately not with this one) and sip on my Maker's Mark Mint Julep while listening to Buckcherry's Ridin'.
They are filled with awe
Then on May 5th it will be passed on to Mary Jane for new adventures.
The band was back again on April 23, 1983 when they performed "I Confess"" & ""Save It for Later." Sadly, the would break up a mere two months later. Though their performances are not currently available, you can watch the legendary Clark interacting with the band during his charming 2-minute interviews.
Karina’s late father surely is looking down upon her today, bursting with pride. I believe I feel just as proud: my dear friend Karina Gentinetta’s feature is published in The New York Times.
The Beer: The styles of beers that Fountainhead will vary, from stouts and porters to IPAs, fruit beers and Belgian-style beers. Ojo recently finished up the label design for my first beer offering called Bullion, which is a golden-colored Belgian Pale Ale. Every summer, he also brew a series of fruit beer called the Summer Infatuation Series. "The name of the series is the result of a joke and therefore, each beer in the series is named after female close friends and acquaintances that my guy friends have had an infatuation with," Ojo explained. "It's silly, humorous and I think the ladies get a kick out of having a beer named after them."
Of the total budget sum, N58
I am back home from Boston safe and sound. It was a good trip. I had a wonderful time at MASSArt and Blicks. Boston is a beautiful city & I was fortunate enough to be there when the weather was good, so I could walk around and view all the beautiful buildings.
So is my heart moving through change.
I decided to buy a VIP ticket to the later Saturday session which I felt had a better speakers panel than the earlier one. I also later learned that the VIP ticket allowed me to cut the line which was definitely a huge added bonus (unfortunately it cost about $17 more than the regular ticket). The speakers for the event included:
Here, take a look at this, with Yo-Ya Ma performing the first movement of the concerto (if you have time, click through to listen to the whole thing, and if you don't wipe a tear in the second movement, go back and listen again, because you've missed something):
Take two pots, one for meat and one for beans in the pot for meat add 4 tablespoons oil, cumin, garlic, sweet chili, cook for 1 minute then add onion, carrot, green onion, bell pepper, parsley, coriander, mustard and tomato paste and cook for three minutes then add the pulled meat, one bouillion cube, soy sauce, Worcestershire sauce, and ½ cup water, cover with a lid and simmer for 5-8 minutes cover medium heat.
Following my MRI and visit with the orthopedic surgeon, the final diagnosis is better than I had feared. It is not a ligament rupture; it is a plain stress fracture of the Navicular and possibly also the cuboid, two of the chunky bones on the top of your foot at the ankle. It appears the main culprit was running down hills, something I will have to be very careful with in the future. I was surprised that I had cracked the chunky bone rather than the long thin metatarsals, but there are big ligaments that attach to the chunky ones and pull hard enough to fracture them when pulled over and over and over and over.
the very skilful strangeness of your smile
In the nick of time I come, plunge in the fight, loudly shout in the
Life is tough, the conflicts are easily imagined as our own, and the choices we make either lead us into deeper trouble or shine a light on a path of redemption and restoration. The choice, as Corin learns, is ours to make. Over and again throughout our lives.
I think I will go out and cut a bouquet and enjoy their lovely scent :-)
UPDATE : 240am CDT 4/23/2012:
It was a mixture of memory degradation and visual hallucination. And then, when everything lost all meaning to him, he sighed and gave in.
Emily: My favorite class in high school…hmmm. It would have to be my English classes with Mr. Stratton. I always looked forward to his class. We would critique movies like Crooklyn, Romeo and Juliet (both of them)… He always made it fun and interesting. He was not everyone’s favorite because he was a little out of the box, but that’s why I liked him. College….hmm again. I really enjoyed my Music Therapy class. If I could have another career and go back and get another Master’s it would be in Music Therapy.
Then it happened. Just a few weeks ago, I found that special ingredient in a box of my grandmother’s yellowed newspaper clips. It seems her grandfather’s birthday was written up in the local Sault Ste Marie newspaper. And, while celebrating his Scottish-ness, that article said he’d come from Canada.
Here is a peek of the cover!
There's no obsequious genuflection to the current vogue for trad-retro revivalism. Some songs trail on for eight minutes plus, and there's no discernible tune on the whole album. The only contemporary band CTC are comparable to, possibly, is Muse, as both embrace ludicrous excess with shameless enthusiasm. And neither, apparently, are afraid of looking ridiculous. While a band that manages to reference both Ogden Nash and the Moody Blues can't be all bad, chances are they're not all good either.
Disney was beautiful.
And disturb them.
Those of you that have known me my whole life, also know that I used to hate summer (especially driving my college clunker car with no air-heat or reverse), I would get hot super easily and I was out of shape and I would sweat just going to get the mail at the mailbox. I would practically stay inside all summer unless I knew someone with a pool. Then Jack came along and I forced myself outside in the summer time for him, but I just wasn't having any fun. Now that I'm in shape and my asthma hardly bothers me anymore and I don't get hot (stay cold all the time now), I LOVE SUMMER! Here are just a few things I am looking forward too this summer:
Looking for a legitimate online business? Not quite sure where to start? In this article I’ll give you some ideas of what you can do to start a legitimate business and what you should avoid. If you follow this advice you could be well on your way to financial freedom, if you ignore this advice you’ll most likely be heading in the other direction.
This is what I love about yoga, loved about rock climbing, love about art, love about photography. Each is complex, so each is ripe for discovery, failure, and learning. The simplicity comes in the form of acceptance: I must accept complexity, the need to learn, the need to fail, the need to succeed, the need for curiosity, the need for beauty, the need for love, the need for anger, the need for everything that comes down to a few simple and precise movements. The need to be present. The need to be human.
i'd like both outfits, mm thank you.
One is my conscience, and the other is the picture, yet again, of another wide-eyed child, yet again, gazing, yet again, at the camera, which yet again, captures the tragedy of . . .
But I guess when you have to land a helicopter in your backyard every day or so, there’s no point in trying to put together a decent garden area?
11. Boys are way more cooler.
If you can’t go back to sleep right away, use the waking moments to meditate, read poetry, write in your journal or look at the moon. Your body will adjust to the new pattern.
We have been married almost 6 years. I can say it has not been the easiest 6 years. I hope that it gets better as we continue on this journey. You already know some of what she dealt with a couple of months after we said "I DO". You never think that the "for worse" part would even come up that quick but it did.
Only in a world of speculation.
The first drop will start in Cockermouth with both Christchurch and All Saints wards completed by the end of the month.
A breach of ethical conduct
While the kids were at the park Jeremy and I went outside and looked at the waterfall. While there the contractions became strong enough that I often teared up during them. Jeremy sang to me and rubbed my back. The experience couldn’t have been any better. Kaye came out to check on us and I told her I was feeling weak. I hadn’t eaten since breakfast. She had offered to get us lunch but we had declined. She got me apple juice with an energy mix in it. It tasted great and I felt much better. She also brought me toast and offered eggs. Jeremy wanted to make sure we made it back inside in time but I wanted to be outside as long as possible. The kids came back at 4:00 P.M. We watched them come up the hill and then they ran over to talk to us. I was in between contractions, which was nice and we were able to talk for a few minutes. The kids just wanted to get inside to get a drink. Jasper was tired so Shayna was going to put him down for a nap.
Format: Vinyl, 12"
P.S. This is a picture of a picture, because I am much too lazy to scan in a copy of the actual photo.
Pink tank top
I have a couple of new journal pages to put up today. So first, the bad news. I've totally bailed on my photo-a-day challenge. It wasn't that I didn't find it interesting or helpful. It was just that it's been in the 100's here and wandering outside with my camera has had zero appeal for me. I'm trying not to beat myself up about it. Not all challenges are going to be met. But on the plus side, I'm still working in my journal.
That’s about it! I just wanted to share that with you guys :)
In come the Vampires – they now rule the world and have enslaved the remaining humans as their pets. Humans have the choice to Register or remain Unregistered. Registered humans are provided for with meal tickets and all the Vampires ask/demand in return is a blood donation every so often. Miss a blood donation appointment and the Vampires will come to collect… and they won’t be nice about it. Unregistered humans have none of the privileges of the registered and are forced to scavenge and steal to survive but get caught thieving and it’s the gallows for you – and they’re serious. The first scene of this novel has Allie witnessing three teenagers hanged as punishment for their stealing ways.
Cried three times during 'Up'.
Bennett's Kitty is a traditional femme fatale in comparison to the more innocent character she played in Woman in the Window; whereas in that film she led Robinson's hapless protagonist to his doom without even meaning to, as though she couldn't help it, in Scarlet Street she's a knowing seductress, even if she has to be prodded into it by Johnny. She projects sex and danger from the first moment she appears on the screen, a see-through raincoat clinging to her body, a sly smirk on her face as she introduces herself with a playful bounce in her voice: "call me Kitty." She's a tough girl, casually sexy, even when she gets a drink with Chris and talks to him with a straw dangling from between her lips. When Johnny accuses her of being obsessed with sex, she immediately spits back, her voice deep and sincere, "what else is there to think about?"
MALTS
You're so materialistic that you didn't even realize that your hand was cut off.
However, I do read every single comment, and I appreciate each one so much!
To see that I had whored myself
"Anything goes"!!
Side note: I also got the Rewards book they had forgotten to give me, went ahead and bought my bra, and found out that the estimated arrival date on my gown is December 20. Yay! I'm excited!
Is there a can of worms here? It should be possible to raise such questions without receiving abuse.
For instance, let’s say you are selling a new financial product that you think is particularly innovative. Always keeping in mind suitability requirements and using approved verbiage within compliance guidelines, you can communicate the benefits of the product on your Facebook fan page. If your fan page is full of current clients and highly targeted potential clients, the result will very likely be that you will get at least a couple of calls or private messages from people interested in learning more.
This is my weekly hop where I post a prompt and you get to write to it on your blog - come back here and add it to my linky and then we all get to go read what you wrote!
Roo is exclusively breastfed on a baby-led schedule. We're practicing ecological breastfeeding, not just because it's easy, but to keep my endometriosis symptoms at bay. He spends all his time with his mommy, so we don't need to express milk anymore. His crib is in our bedroom and we also bedshare part of the night.
“Camping?” she asked.
Dad, a black man, won Firefighter of the Year because he was the best! Yes, I am a black conservative Republican and proud of it. All you blacks who think the Democrats are your friends, wake up and smell the betrayal."
I don't really write poetry. My song lyrics, of course, but I struggle with those, and in any case, one might say that every song I've written is a lie: usually they are about a character, even if written in the first person, and even when I am talking about myself I will freely change facts or even themes to make a rhyme or to enable a cool line. This post is in the spirit of a poem, but my forte is prose (that is the only way I know how to tell the truth) so that is how I will deliver it.
